
                   Dr Calvi is extremely knowledgeable of the subject matter however he has no empathy.  He refuses to help or explain anything.  He just refers to the reading assignments.  I had to resort to recruiting my DAs help just to get a C.  Makes you feel dumb when you don't understand. 
                
                   Dr. Calvi is a great professor. This class makes you think outside the box as far as interpreting administrative law. It is an absolutely outstanding class and he has an amazing grasp on the topic. 
                
                   This is far and away the best class I have ever taken. Dr. Calvi is brilliant and you will learn a lot. It isn't easy, but if you always read prepare, you will get at least a B. His lectures are wonderful, interesting, and clear. Exams are really difficult so take advantage of the extra credit offers. Calvi is the reason I am going to law school.
                
                   Rough class.  Half the students dropped by mandatory drop day, and several of them were supposed to graduate that semester.  He does not give an A, no matter what.  He doesn't "round up" to passing if you get a 69.8.  He is a good professor and knows his stuff, but this class is anything but a cake walk.
                
                   Dr. Calvi is exceptionally unclear in his expectations. He uses a participation grade that is awarded at the end of the class.  This grade is very subjective and is a major portion of the overall grade. It would be beneficial if Dr. Calvi would take interest in actually teaching his students instead of simply pushing his opinion.
                
                   Dr. Calvi is amazing. He is the best professor that I have ever had. He demands alot but you learn a lot in return. I would definately reccomend his class to anyone.
                
                   This class sealed the deal on me going to law school. If you liked the material that you covered in this class and the format of the class (socratic method) you will enjoy law school if you didn't law school will be hell
                
                   The tests are very tricky with answers that might be easily overlooked in the book. If you were given more time or possibly less tricky questions you would be able to have more success on the exams!
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Dr. Calvi is VERY demanding. His classes will take a ton of time. You will learn lost from him however so it is worth it. Very politically minded. Very social. He has chats for his online classes which are a great use of the online media for learning, but they become time consuming and tedious. Very helpful. Good professor.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Very helpful. Online tests not difficult and can be googled easily. Voice not monotonous. Loves what he teaches. Very personable & works with athletic schedules well. Lots of extra credit opportunities. Can literally miss entire tests & pass the class (he admits to that). Tests open for 1 week online. Makes boring class interesting. Great teacher!!
                
                   This class is not easy at all, but it is one of the most fundamental ones for political science majors. The amount of theory you learn will help in almost every other class. Dr. Commissiong is brilliant, but his lectures are almost impossible to follow some days. Don't let that discourage you; just read and try to follow along until you understand.
                
                   I would not recommend this prof if you're taking PoliSci online. It is quite apparent that he does not like online teaching. Seems like he goes out of his way to make things more difficult. His tests are directly from the book. If you stay on top of it, you can do well. His discussion topics are super difficult too. Plan to devote lots of time!!!
                
                   I have him for an upper level class and I really like his class,I am taking another next semester. He is nice to students (I have seen him around campus and he is always polite), and engages the class. I was surprised to see some of the reviews.  I am guessing it's due to the fact that online classes in general present more problems than in person.
                
                   DO NOT take this class if you can not read and retain information. Too hard!!
                
                   This teacher is very interesting and the class is easy if you're good at reading and retaining the information. Show up to class and look half way alive to receive a helpful attendance grade, no need to pay attention. Nothing he teaches do you need to know. Only test. They're online, you have a week to take and are 100% over book reading. So read.
                
                   This professor is extremely rude to his students. I took his online class and asked questions via email and was always answered with some form of "you should've known this, this is common sense" response. His tests are directly off the chapters, nothing to do with lectures at all. Very difficult class to take online
                
                   I would recommend not taking him. From day one I was shocked at how he taught the class and how he treated the students. Every time I had a problem I had to consult with IT, and still then he couldn't give you the benefit of the doubt. All lectures are not on the tests. And the tests will kill you if you dont get an A or B every time. To hard!!!!!!
                
                   DON'T TAKE HIM. I almost filed a formal complaint. I took his online class and had to get a tutor. His tests were impossible and he was downright rude when I asked questions. I knew someone who took his class after I took it and she was as desperate for help as I was.
                
                   Teacher requires attendance and usually gives extra credit when you attend also textbook is used. Open book tests they are hard but read and take NOTES. Should at least get a B
                
                   this teacher teaches but all of his tests are open book...they are not easy but if you READ the chapters you shall do fine. Also attendance is required for his class. Sometimes it can be boring but that is what college is all about. He lectures for knowledge and al of his tests are based entirely on textbook materials
                
                   Dr. Thoman teaches the most boring class at WT, I won't lie, but go to class before the tests to get the review and put a little effort into studying. It isn't a hard class by any means. The only grades are from the tests, so don't slack on them. 
                
                   Dr. Thoman might be as old as the earth itself, but he's sweet. His lectures are super boring and hard to pay attention, but you don't have to go to pass. As long as you get the handouts and read the book (most of the test is from the book) then you should be fine. He's a great guy.
                
                   Very nice old man, he prints outlines for every lecture, but most of material comes from the text book. Which you have to read on your own time. You dont really have to go to class, just keep up with the readings. Only grades are the test, but he will allow you to make them up if you miss! Great old man.
                
                   He is older and it is hard to pay attention. His tests weren't the easiest but most came from the book, but some came from things he said. So if you miss them you don't get the questions.
                
                   Dr. Thoman was a great professor. Really easy to understand. Test were not hard at all. And he is also a really nice guy, I was late to the final by over an hr and he allowed me to finish final in his office. Attendance is not mandatory, but if you go don't just sign the sign in sheet and leave, I found that extremely rude that people would do that
                
                   He didn't care about his students. He wrote outlines for every chapter which was what I was use to then for the final, he totally didn't!Now I have to change up my whole exam study rotinue becuase he &quot;didn't have time&quot; to write an outline. That is his job! I do not recommend him and I think he should retire already.
                
                   Dr. Thoman is really informative and his exams are straight from textbook material. I liked having him because if the topic is interesting he is interesting telling you about it.  He does not require outside classwork which is a big + b/c you don't have to spread yourself thin. When I was there, his texts were all essay. Good pick.
                
                   Dr. Thoman is nearly as old as Christmas, but he is a really good source for Political information.  He lectures the entire class and never has outside assignments.  His exams are not comprehensive so they only cover about 4 chapters a piece.  I recommend using the Textbook website to study because Dr. Thoman uses a test bank from the book.
                
                   Good Prof. Attendance is recommended but not required. My only issue is that there was no homework or quizzes whatsoever. It may make life easier, but if you bomb out on one of the four exams, you just lost 1/4 of your grade.  Would recommend him, IF AND ONLY IF, you will study for the exams. they are all you're graded off of.
                
                   Dr. Welch is a great professor. If you attend class, it is an easy A. A very worthwhile course that was very interesting at times. He knows what he is talking about and really cares about his students. I recommend his class and would take him again.
                
                   love love love taking his classes. anyone can speak up in class and be free to express their opinion. I missed a final one time because I thought it was on a different day. I would recommend this class to anyone
                
                   I have taken three classes with Dr. Welch now and all three have been excellent, easy, and interesting. He is passionate about what he teaches and is very knowledgeable. He shows a lot of funny videos to keep it interesting. He does ramble at times, so bring a laptop if you don't feel like listening to his football game recaps.
                
                   Dr. Welch is amazing!! Best professor makes everything so easy to understand and follow along with. There is no need for your book I never opened mine, as long as you go to class for all the notes he doesn't test anything that he hasn't actually said. This is my worst subject but was my favorite class, he's great!
                
                   He is a really good professor, and is personable.
                
                   I really like his classes, he isn't trying to throw you off. Good professor.
                
                   His tests were not hard at all.  Take notes and pay attentio coz everything he says in class will be on the test. Reading book is not necessary.
                
                   I never read the book and made an A on every test. Copy the outline, take short notes on video clips, and go to SI sessions before every test to get an easy A.
                
                   Dr. Welch is a great professor. His classes were fun and interesting. However you MUST attend and you MUST pay attention to the lectures, if you don?t you will do poorly. His tests are multiple choice and short essays. The multiple choice are super easy but on the short essay you need to write all you can think of on that topic.
                
                   Dr.Welch is a really good professor, his test aren't the easiest but they are not too hard either.He is really nice and friendly towards his students. As long as you read the chapters and attend class you should be fine, that is what his test are off of.He really knows his stuff and is one of the better poli sci professors.A class worth taking.
                
                   Dr. Welch is awesome sometimes it was boring but trust me other teachers a more boring. If his tests are all his lectures and if you need help he has si sessions
                
                   Lame class...very hard. All he does is lecture and then a exam after 3 chapters. Dont take this class
                
                   No Comments
                
                   any class you take with him you will walk out with a new outlook on life... knows his stuff and relates it well ... very enjoyable class
                
                   Way too difficult.
                
                   
                
                   The class wasn't extremely difficult.  Her lectures can get a little confusing because she does seem to ramble, just make sure you try to take really good notes. Reading the text is a necessity; exams and quizzes come from both the lectures and the textbook. She gives pretty good reviews for the exams and the final was optional(straight from exams)
                
                   She is very understanding, the quizzes are only 5 questions long and one time she straight up gave us all the answers. It's easy if you pay attention. I don't know why everyone is saying this class is so hard, I have a 98 in there right now. There is a group project that's worth 35% of your grade. 
                
                   The previous two comments pretty much summarized it all. Tests are impossible to do good on unless you just have a thing for this subject. Gives lecture notes, but has nothing to do with tests. Gives an optional final to replace a lowest test grade if you make a better grade. Not a fun class..
                
                   Worst professor I've ever had! Never ever responds to emails, not there during her office hours, she flies through her lecture notes in class and refuses to go back a slide for students who weren't able to copy the notes. Her tests are so random and impossible to make an A on even if you study for hours.
                
                   Definitely the worst professor that I have ever taken. If you are not good at writing, I would strongly advise to not take this class. The final is take home, but it is about 15 pages typed. Test are not east, there is no curve on the tests. Very asinine talking about why students did so poorly. Does not want to help. Suggest not to take her.
                
                   Great Prof. Took him for both 207 and 206.He has a good sense of humor and gets the class involved during class. He will be willing to help you and cares about your grade. He often gives free quiz grades just for showing up. The Textbook is a must because alot of the test and quizs are straight from it. Would recommend him.
                
                   This class was awesome! Being an engineer, I hate all classes that aren't math and science... like HATE them. Professor Brown was very fair with his tests and he was very funny and made the material interesting. One of the best classes I've taken so far.
                
                   Awesome prof! He's big on class participation and often gives free quiz grades just for signing in. Brown is willing to work with you if you aren't satisfied with your grade and is genuinely interested in your success. He has a great sense of humor and is very knowledgeable about the material.
                
                   This class was not easy, but I really enjoyed it. His lectures are great! He is very entertaining to listen to, and he is also very smart. He gave three, 3 point extra credit assignments, and 1 or 2 extra credit quizzes. I made 80-100's on all the reading quizzes without even reading the book! Take this class, you won't regret it.
                
                   He is funny and interesting, but will call randomly on students to give their opinion/answer questions.  He has a tendency to be somewhat rude to students but he prepares you well for the tests and gives lots of extra credit.  He's easy to follow and you don't have to study too much to do well.
                
                   Brown is a funny guy and like the material he teaches. He is big on class participation but also big on calling people out just to see them squirm. I didnt read the book and just studied the notes which got me a decent grade. As far as POLS professors go, he is alright.
                
                   I loved Brown's class! Very funny teacher, cool sense of humor, willing to answer any and all questions. Yes, he changed his attendance policy in the middle of the year, but it was an easy grade just to show up and sign in. Exams were straight out of book/notes and lots of extra credit opportunities. I will be taking his class for POLS 206!
                
                   He is a very confusing teacher not only about the material. He says attendance isn't mandatory and then hands out an attendance sheet for a grade. Don't take him! Not a good class.
                
                   he is a good teacher and i recommend him to other students. if you do to class and take notes you should get an A. He also gives a review day when you get most of the anser for the test
                
                   i would recommend him to anyone....
                
                   No Comments
                
                   His class is really easy as long as you take notes and go to class. Don't bother buying the book all of the test questions are from the lecture.
                
                   Let's you out early!
                
                   HIS TESTS ARE SO EASY. HE GIVES YOU A STUDY GUIDE FOR EACH TEST THAT IS SO HELPFUL, BUT YOU WILL ALSO NEED GOOD NOTES. HIS TEST IS STRIGHT FROM THE NOTES AND THE STUDY GUIDE.
                
                   Too liberal
                
                   No Comments
                
                   He would ramble on about random facts that had nothing to do with the subject.  Also, his tests were mazes that were almost impossible to traverse.
                
                   Dixon is extremely nice. However, his class and tests are very difficult. Lectures do not match what was on the tests. I read each chapter in the textbook, attended class, and was still lost. Test questions are lengthy and tricky. He tends to get off on random tangents while lecturing. Highly recommend taking this class with another professor. 
                
                   I think it would be less painful to shoot myself in the foot than to listen to him mumble about irrelevance.  This class makes me questions the credibility of TAMU.
                
                   Im an engineering major, and I took this class for credit, but it was by far the worst class I have ever taken! The only one I had to drop so far. He goes off on tangents and lectures are often rambling and hard to follow.  The tests consists or specific numbers or trivial statistics and are usually curved. Save yourself some money.
                
                   Worst teacher ever. Literally rants for an hour and half. Possibly one of the most annoying power points I have ever seen.
                
                   His lectures are very long-winded and he'll often spend a good portion of class on an irrelevant tangent. However, as long as you capture the essence of what he says based on what he puts on his powerpoints, you should get a good grip on it. READING for the Key Terms is absolutely essential for the tests; don't skip it, or you'll regret it!
                
                   The tests were hard to understand, and his lectures were almost laughable.  He goes off on tangents, and then says the same thing he just said, but using different words.  Also, I think he spent about 5 minutes total in the front of the class.  His spot is in the middle.
                
                   Lectures were very boring, and I never really paid any attention. I read the chapters twice and went to  supplemental instruction hours and I managed to get a B in the class. My recommendation is to take it at Blinn in an online minimester.
                
                   Professor Dixon is a tough professor. I am a Political Science major and have struggled through this class. The tests were not the hardest but the quizzes were. You have to take very detailed notes and do not try and do any kind of format. His lectures are long and a bit boring. Go to every class or you will get a C or below. 
                
                   I had him for Gateway this past summer and made the bare minimum I needed on my final to make a C and I studied my ass off. His test averages without a curve are low D's to failing. His lectures are drug out and he goes off on so many tangents that you don't know what's important. His tangents have tangents. SAVE YOURSELF and DROP THIS CLASS.
                
                   His lectures are pretty dry, so make sure you are more than awake heading into class. You will have to study and read all of the required reading but its not anything a college student shouldn't be able to do.
                
                   An old fashioned teacher who thinks he's new fashioned. He rambles so much. He is nice and will talk to you but his tests are completely different from each other so they are impossible to study for. His key terms are as unclear as his lectures, he doesn't know when to use quotation marks, and his class is a GPA risk. My only B of the semester.
                
                   Dixon is a really nice professor. Honestly, his instructions to do well in the class are pretty straight forward and easy. Just do the Key Terms and study his lecture slides and you'll be fine.
                
                   Professor Dixon's class is nothing you can't handle, but if you don't read and don't go to class you won't do well. His lectures might seem unrelated to the test/book, but they're not. You have to pay attention to the significance of things. He's interested in causes and effects of things, not dry facts. He's a challenging prof, but good.
                
                   Dr. Dixon is a very good professor, in my opinion. The tangents that everyone complains about are simply more detailed observations about the material at hand. Contrary to what a few people have said here, his tests have almost everything to do with what he says in lecture. However, as he's always said, it's also based on the reading material.
                
                   This class is not impossible, but needs a large amount of study time and REQUIRES going to both tutoring and SI sessions.
                
                   His voice put me to sleep. His tests are very hard. I have a lot more hatred that I just can't put into words.
                
                   GET A NEW PROFESSOR. Worst professor I have ever had. His &quot;lectures&quot; are pointless rants with nothing to do on his exams. He &quot;teaches&quot; as if it's federal government, asking to fill in the blanks on the Dec of Ind for exams. Horrible teaching style. Memorize every chart in the book and regurgitate every states rankings. Horrible semester.
                
                   Please.  Dixon is easy.  If you think otherwise, I hope you have an easy major.  Plus his looks and mannerisms remind me of George Carlin, and his rants/tangents are funny.  He gets worked up sometimes.
                
                   This is suppose to be a state gov class but he teaches like it's national. He is very liberal and it shows in his teaching, to the point of claiming the 10th amendment is pointless. Avoid this guy at all costs
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   lots of reading!!!  made us read the new york times, which i thought was very biast. i wouldnt take another class from this woman!
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Hardly went to class and still made an A.  Gives reviews class before the test which is basically the test.
                
                   Gives study guides for all tests that are almost exactly what is on the tests.
                
                   gives very helpful studyguide and tests are mostly definitions. Lectures can be boring and/or disorganized but great personality.
                
                   He cares a lot about you!
                
                   I really liked Dr. Geva, but his lectures tended to drag since he went off-topic a lot. It  was hard at times to follow his train of thought, but I wrote down almost everything he said & that definitely helped me with the tests. He's great though with helping students write reports & he gives the class a chance to ask questions. 
                
                   Lectures are slide-based and pretty boring. Grades consist of 2 tests, 2 papers, and 2 data collection assignments. The tests were not very difficult, but he does grade the papers pretty critically, but allows you to submit them earlier for feedback. He is also unclear in explaining how to write the papers. He is personable and funny though.
                
                   Great Professor! Really cares whether or not you learn. Two research papers, two short 2 page assignments and 2 tests. Would definitely take another class from him.
                
                   Fantastic professor. This was a writing intensive class that had 2 essays (~4 pages each), 2 short reports (1-2 pages each), and 2 MC exams. He gives you a list of things to study for the exams and asks nothing that's not on it. He will accept any paper as many times as you want to submit it so you're practically guaranteed an A in the class.
                
                   AMAZING professor.  Teaches things that are actually applicable to the real world. Tests aren't too hard if you understand the concepts from the book.  His lectures are unforgettable and always has funny anecdotes.  Absolutely one of the best profs I've ever had.
                
                   VERY interesting lecture but i wouldn't recommend him. The hardly taught over anything on the test. The tests are short and hard, i read the entire textbooks and went to all SI sessions and still barely got a C. It was ridiculous.
                
                   Not recommended. Not that helpful and likes to call out people to try to put them on the spot. Ton of reading from a very dull textbook.
                
                   While his lectures were quite interesting, rarely did it pertain to material tested on the exams. Reading the textbook is a must, but he states that class is optional. However, he typically has great discussions, so you will want to attend. If you have problems understanding political science concepts, then his exams will be quite difficult.
                
                   He was a fairly interesting professor, but his sarcasm often bordered on being mean. Maybe I had an off-semester for him, but he was very apathetic toward us. Going to class felt like a waste of time. He wasn't awful, but I don't recommend him.
                
                   Although I dislike government classes, Mr. Godwin was a fantastic teacher and I learned more from him then any other gov teacher I've had before. He's a funny, laid-back guy who really knows his stuff. I highly recommend him. He will make you think about government in ways you might not have before. Definitely NOT a forgettable experience
                
                   One of my all time favorite professors. He spends roughly the first half of class discussing state & local government, then gives everyone the choice of staying or leaving while he goes off topic. 90% of the test questions are from the textbook and 10% are from lecture. As long as you put in the extra effort to read thoroughly, you can do well.
                
                   Lectures were interesting (although did not always apply to state and local gov). Three tests are the only grades. He really cares about his students. He wants everyone to do well since its a required course. The tests have random questions but he curves them. Must read textbook. Attendance is optional but 4 questions (out of 40) are from lecture
                
                   easy class, nice lady. tests are straight out of lecture notes. can get notes from notes n quotes. never takes attendance--only 1-4 questions on test from text book, dont really need to read it
                
                   Very nice man, but did not engage in small talk or try to have a bond with the class. Comes off more as a research-oriented prof, rather than a instructor-oriented one. This made the already boring material even less interesting, and didnt leave you with a lot of motivation to tackle the assignments, except to get a good grade. 2 exams, 4 reports
                
                   Dr. Kellstedt's class is tough, but manageable. Grades consist of 2 tests, 1 research paper, and occasional pop quizzes over the readings. His lectures are entertaining and interesting, but he does tend to go off topic a lot. He's a pretty tough grader too, and he's somewhat arrogant and not very helpful. You'll learn a lot from his class though.
                
                   The hardest professor you could pick for POLS 209 at TAMU. He's also a passive-aggressive jerk if he doesn't like you
                
                   Professor Kellstedt is a nice guy, but this class is super hard. He wrote the text book and it is all statistics and math. The class is required for all POLS majors, and is all math, which we typically aren't great at. So read and go to class and best of luck with this class.. 
                
                   
                
                   Stopped going to class and read textbook; got 90s on all the tests.  She tends to go off on rants during lectures and has a weird sense of humor.
                
                   She's to the point, makes class fun (funny), test are rather do-able... you just HAVE to make sure you attend class; because many questions come from the lecture and like half from the book. She's GREAT! :D
                
                   Her lectures are interesting, however i found them not helpful at all for the tests. Read the book carefully and go over her slides from class. Her questions on the test aren't always clear -- and some answers are very closely related and hard to choose between.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Sit up front in this class- she is hard to hear otherwise.  SI Reviews aren't helpful, but if you pay attention and take notes in class, you can get by without reading the text.  I didn't believe her when she said buying the text was optional, but save yourself the $100 as long as you go to class and pay attention.
                
                   There's only 4 tests so you have to do really well on them. Her lectures have nothing to do with the book but you still have to read the chapters. Multiple times. A lot of it is remembering facts or application of those facts. She's really interesting though and gives insight to our ultra conservative university.
                
                   I really enjoyed Dr. Lim, but her class is tough. Make sure you know your stuff really well, both class notes and the textbook, because the 4 tests are super detailed.
                
                   Her class is all lecture and reading. Her tests are pretty hard, and there is no curve. You have to either go to class or be prepared to read the textbook in detail. Her lectures are interesting and many times funny because she puts a very liberal spin on things for a professor at a very conservative college.
                
                   Four tests (they aren't very tricky), no final. She's funny and borderline offensive sometimes, but if you go into it knowing she's going to try and push your buttons its not a big deal. You could get by not going to class and just reading the textbook closely, but make sure you don't miss the tests as they are given during regular class time.
                
                   Dr. Lim is insane, in a good way. She makes extreme arguments that, along with her jokes, keep the class interesting. I learned a great deal in her class, and would definitely take her again. POLS 207 is very data and statistics based, which worked for me but not everyone. Book helps. Class only has four tests- no assignments and no final.
                
                   She is super funny and that helps to keep her lectures interesting. She lectures off of power points that she posts online. If you read the book and study her power points it is not hard to make an A. 
                
                   You have to study for her test, but she if funny and interesting.
                
                   She was not a very helpful teacher. I went to class, took notes, read my book, studied and even went to tutoring and still did poorly in her class. Would not recommend for people who are not very detail-oriented and have a hard time memorizing things. She is very opinionated and can be very rude. 
                
                   I love Lim! She's hilarious and makes learning POLS easy.  I didn't necessarily agree with her political views, but as long as you read the book and listen to her during lecture, you will pass.  GRAPHS ARE IMPORTANT! Learn the graphs and what they mean in the book and the lectures.  She posts all her slides online, so print them or download. 
                
                   funny prof Hard class but eh thats 207 in general. Warning  she can get very liberal in class so if political views are sensitive to you don't take. test were hard and make up the grade for the entire class which is the down side but she is able to go over where you went wrong. Great prof hard class though
                
                   Funny and sarcastic professor. Really enjoyable.  It's best to turn up for class because a couple of exam questions come from the lecture instead of the textbook. 3 exams and 1 final, all 25%, so you can't really afford to mess any of them up :
                
                   Grading was 4 50 question multiple choice tests, no final. Sounds great, but gives no extra credit or other opportunities to get grades, so don't mess up the tests. Lectures everything you need to know, which is straight from the book, but generally going to class is the key to doing well.
                
                   So, she can be a hard professor. But when you learn how to take her class, it becomes easier. Read each chapter over at LEAST 3 times. Print out her outlines and know them too. You will be expected to apply the information in realistic situations instead of actually memorizing it. Know the material, and you will pass. Attendance is optional.
                
                   She is very vocal about her beliefs and you can expect her to go off on tangents about them, rather than covering the actual course material. She does a good job giving dynamic lectures that keep one engaged. Tests are quite difficult and reading the textbook is a MUST.
                
                   Read the textbook and go over notes multiple times for exams. Hilarious and super sarcastic
                
                   She's controversial and confrontational on issues that matter. She teaches politics as it is, not as a history class, and for that reason alone it was amazing. She does explain things with a bias, but those biases are backed with facts and statistics, and she tells stories to help you retain the information. Loved her, would recommend to anyone.
                
                   She had interesting and helpful lectures that explained the more difficult concepts from the text.
                
                   Going to class  really helps, and read the book! And honestly I'd read it twice. I didn't but I heard it helped so much! After tests if you go to her office hours she will review every question you got wrong with her.
                
                   Her lectures were funny & correlated with the book well. Most of the material on the tests were application based. No easy questions. Know your material, and be able to know how to apply it. Wouldn't recommend if you aren't interested in government-Take Roblyer. She  curved my final grade 4 points which was a letter grade which was a huge surprise 
                
                   Tests are tough. Going to class is not mandatory, but I recommend you go. Her lectures are extremely interesting. She reiterates important information you'll need for the exam. 
                
                   Is a funny man, but not a good teacher. He only goes over his book, and the tests are so wordy and confusing. He asks questions that are pretty tough to answer, because there are no graphs to correspond to the question. Take someone else if you can, but if not, read that book like it's the Bible
                
                   One of the worst professors I've had.  He writes his own book and it has a lot of errors.  Office hours are pointless and he never gives you a clear answer.  I highly recommend someone else
                
                   Lecture is useless.  He wrote the book and doesn't cover anything outside of it.  Read the book and you'll do great.
                
                   Read textbook - attend class. Test from text & lecture/prof opinion. DON'T be late for exams! DON'T expect a curve - will not give it - 3 test grades ARE your grade. Recommendation for taking his class / probably NOT
                
                   It is impossible to make an A in the class  There are only three test for your grade and he doesn?t post any previous tests its hard know what to focus on studying for 1st test. Half of his test are straight from lecture. I didn?t do any studying until 3 days before each test and got 89s. This class is defiantly easy to pass just hard to excel.
                
                   Dr. Pedraza is an incredible teacher and the future of Latino Politics. This is not an &quot;easy A&quot;. If you're looking for a skate class, take someone else. I'm a strait A student and got a B. But if you want an edge over your peers on trends of the fastest growing voting bloc, this is the class. Once you enter your political career, you'll thank him.
                
                   He is interesting but his exams suck. Half the exam comes from the textbook and the other half comes from his bias. He literally writes &quot;What does Professor Pedraza think about...&quot; The book half is easy, the bias half destroys your grade. P.S. he does not curve
                
                   I took Dr. Rice for a summer session and I would take him again, he is clear how he wants his short assignment turned in. He made use do a 10-12 page paper that was useless to be honest, start on it early. He is funny and talks a lot about race and gender. Some people felt singled out, but he is just being him. Need some kind of tough skin. 
                
                   DONT TAKE RICE. This class is an easy B if you're into that; however, if you are shooting for an A, STAND CLEAR. Rice is very unclear of how he wants the assignments completed, his tests are poorly written, and he is about the laziest prof you will ever meet. He is not helpful at all. I will never take Dr. Rice again. 
                
                   Smith is by far the funniest professor I have ever had! He makes government interesting by making jokes and keeping the class entertained. He tells you what will be on the test during lectures so don't skip!
                
                   Smith is a great professor. He explains everything thoroughly, so attend lectures and take good notes. Read the book sometimes, a lot of test questions are pulled from it word for word. The quizzes are open book and easy points. He is a really funny guy who makes an otherwise boring topic interesting.
                
                   Wow! I stinking' LOVE Smith!! I'm just upset that I told everyone how awesome he was my freshman year, because now his class is always the first to be full! I REFUSE to take any other professor for 207! He's a goof. He so cares about you being a good citizen and he knows that you are only taking his class because you need it.   TAKE SMITH!!!
                
                   This class was amazing, I made a B. I would have made an A if I would have attended class the day he gave out 10point total grade extra credit. Overall, the test are easy. READ THE BOOK.  It helps, it's no trick - exact wording is on the test. He gives quizzes online, which are exact of the book. The lectures are short and he is funny.
                
                   Professor Smith does a great job of explaining the grading criteria for the class. Online quizzes are important to your grade, so spend time on them. Tests are easy. Lectures can go off topic sometimes but his tangents are quite funny and engaging. Extra credit for attendance is random throughout semester.
                
                   Pretty great as far as required gov. class professors go. Everything is multiple choice with just a few tests and quizzes and thats it. If you read/go to class most of the time you'll pass with an easy A or B. He's really funny and keeps lectures somewhat interesting. Go because they aren't terrible and he tests over what he talks about in class.
                
                   Professor Smith was a great professor and all of his lectures were very entertaining. I have never enjoyed government before, but he made government interesting. He lectures on what will be on the tests, so as long as you listen to his lectures and take good notes you will be fine. I would definitely take one of Professor Smith's classes again!
                
                   Best professor ever. Gives extra credit and his exams are easy if you just listen to his lectures, which are entertaining. Also gives a review for every exam. You need the textbook for quizzes though
                
                   He makes it clear that he truly cares about how you do in the class. He makes sure that you understand the concepts in the class and is genuinely funny as well. He's truly one of the best and I would absolutely recommend taking him!
                
                   It's clear from day one that he wants everyone to do well in his class, & makes it very doable. He gives reviews before tests, extra credit, &take home quizzes to boost grade.  Attendance isn't mandatory anymore, but class is helpful. Buy the ONLINE book for quizzes & reviews to search key words! Grade  3 tests, 5 take home quizzes - NO FINAL
                
                   Take him!! I had him this semester and as long as you attend lectures and take notes over what he says, he makes it easy for you to get an A. He ended up giving us a total of 7 extra credit points and his tests are very similar to his reviews. Do the test review, read the book for an A, and go to class. He's super funny and goes on tangents too!
                
                   He is sarcastic, but the information is portrayed somewhere in what he is talking about. He cares a lot about his topic, which is why he may get off topic frequently. On random days he gives extra credit just for attending. His reviews help very well for the three exams and you may use your book for the 8 online quizzes. Straightforwar info, easy A
                
                   One of the best teachers I've had. Does not force his ideologies down the throats of his students, he's more concerned about being knowledgeable and voting regardless of beliefs. Gives study guides for tests and is super passionate, goes off on some funny tangents and is sarcastic. 10/10 would recommend.
                
                   Prof. Smith is awesome! Coming from a student who hates Government, he made this class super interesting. Attendance is not mandatory, but I would suggest going because he gives extra credit. He's very passionate about the subject he teaches, and truly cares about his students and wants them to succeed. He's easily one of my favorite professors!
                
                   Pretty funny, if you dont like sarcasm, hes not the prof for you. Gives reviews for tests that are basically the same thing. Really patriotic and passionate about his field. Bring up baseball and you're pretty much golden. 
                
                   Professor Smith is someone who is extremely passionate about the subject that he teaches but he doesn't bore you with it. He has lots of jokes, although sometimes lame, and keeps you interested in a subject that most people wouldn't find interesting. Also most importantly he makes you want to get involved and be a good citizen of the United States
                
                   Be ready to help yourself. A lot of the class is self guided, meaning that the assignments are all individual and turned in online. Most, if not all, material is posted online from the beginning, so attendance is pretty optional if you're willing to study but there is extra credit some days! Very passionate, but be prepared for cheesy dad jokes...
                
                   Loved this guy! He is actually pretty fun, keeps it light with his unique humor, and  has a great passion for political science. His tests are just like the reviews and as long as you follow his attendance policy, you will get a high grade. Took him for both political sciences I needed.
                
                   Great prof, very strict on attendance, everything is easy but his test. He basically has it set up to where you will pass even if you don't do well on the test.
                
                   This class was a breeze. Attendance is not mandatory, but he does occasionally reward the students that actually show up. Wants you to get involved in politics so he makes the lectures fun and wants you to enjoy the class. Take-home quizess are super easy ( all answers can be found in the book). Recommend this professor and hoping to take him again
                
                   Honestly, if you just pay attention in class it shouldn't be that bad. But actually pay attention because he doesn't post his lectures, or has powerpoints, or anything really! But he's a great lecturer and very passionate.
                
                   This man presents a ridiculous amount of information in class and then requires you to read probably twice as much new information outside of class. He then makes his tests extraordinarily hard with obscure information and two answers on every question that sound correct. Do not take Teodoro for POLS 207 unless political science is your life.
                
                   Super interesting, but not an easy A by any means. Worth the effort though.
                
                   He is a great lecturer, and extremely funny to boot.  I actually enjoyed going to his class.  The readings he assigns are very boring, but he makes up for it in his lectures.
                
                   Professor Teodoro is one of the best professors I have ever had here at TAMU. You can tell this class is something that he is truly passionate about and he makes his lectures interesting for his students. The tests are fairly easy, I never took notes in class and didn't read the book until the day before a test, and I still ended up with a B.
                
                   Honestly, if you are a good notetaker, active listener, and know how to read  you will do fine in his class. His office hours are very helpful, you might see him as a hard to approach professor but when you speak to him you will find him very supportive and helpful. Your grade relies on four test grades but he drops the lowest grade.
                
                   Had 4 tests- 20%, 25%, 25%, and the last was 30% 10 questions of previous/cumulative material and 30 of this chapter.  No reviews or practice questions given, you just have to read when you're advised to and listen carefully to his lectures.  He intentionally makes it hard for the "educated guessers" Very interesting, just difficult tests!
                
                   Professor Teodoro is a great lecturer. I have never been interested in history-type classes, but I was in his class. There's 4 tests, all are cumulative. As long as you take good notes and read, you should not have any difficulty getting at least a B in this course. Take Teodoro!
                
                   Dr. Teodoro was an awesome teacher, I really enjoyed his lectures and looked forward to going to class every week. Overall, taking good notes and attendance are necessary if you want to do well in the class. Also, understanding theories/concepts is the key to excelling on exams, don't waste your time memorizing facts. 
                
                   1st time rating a professor but Teodoro is amazing. Take his class. Always available for help in office hours, passionate and clear during lecture, and requires understanding, not just memorization to succeed. Go to lecture, read the book, and work to understand concepts, not just memorize, and you will succeed.  One of the best professors here
                
                   So freaking amazing. Never wanted to miss any of his lectures and that's a first! You can tell by the amazingness/clarity of his lectures, just how much effort he puts in to his lectures. 4 exams and they require effort. Lectures are a huge deal, reading is important, but the biggest of all is an actual understanding! Wish others were like him:(  
                
                   This class is not easy. You are definitely going to have to put in the work, such as taking good notes during lectures and keeping up with his assigned readings. What I enjoyed about this course was also Teodoro himself. The guy is incredibly funny and his lectures are informative and interesting. Overall, I would take him again.
                
                   Professor Teodoro is an excellent professor. Definitely the best lecturer I've ever had. Very interesting and informative lectures, and he really cares about the material and the student's understanding. Only grades in the class were four tests but there was a lot of reading that played a big part in success on the tests. Curved all tests a bit. 
                
                   I loved Professor Teodoro's pols 207 class, there might be a lot of reading involved but he himself is what makes the class great. He has the funniest stories and my favorite part is when he explains the way that members of Congress vote. Overall, would take again but just be ready to read and attend class and an A or a B is easily attainable. 
                
                   Teodoro is an amazing professor! Most interesting class taken all semester. His lectures are really interesting and easy to understand. He is witty, fun and makes it extremely easy to get lost in the lecture! His tests are fairly easy if you truly study all of your lecture notes and do the readings. Easy B, maybe easy A if you put in the effort.
                
                   Would take professor again. Really good class 
                
                   Amazing professor. He is passionate in what he does and make the class very interesting. His lectures are always well prepared and informative. Tests are fairly difficult but if you study your notes and the textbook, you should be fine. I would definitely take this professor again and recommend him to anyone. 
                
                   Really passionate about what he does and he's also hilarious which makes lectures interesting. Must read the book to do well on tests. No final, just 4 cumulative tests which are your only grades in the class. Doesn't take attendance, but he doesn't post slides online so you must go to class or get notes from someone else. 
                
                   Really nice guy and a great speaker. is very clear about most every subject and uses great metaphors and analogies. he is really great with helping students. You absolutely must do all the readings and go to all the lectures possible. it is not an easy A, but if you go to all the lectures and study a moderate amount, an A is not hard.
                
                   Dr. Teodoro gives 4 exams, weighted more heavily as the semester goes on, and those are the only grades. No homework, just reading. Dr. Teodoro has read the chapters himself and knows how to answer answer any questions. His lectures are in-depth and lively/entertaining. Study in groups and you'll pass easily (that's how he encourages you to study).
                
                   She is really knowledgeable about Latin America. lectures from a ppt but keeps class interesting with examples and is very informative. I highly suggest her! Tests are challenging if you are not comfortable with the notes and the ereserve readings.
                
                   She knows Latin American politics incredibly well.  Interesting lectures most of the time, but she does go quickly.  Uses PPT slides, very easy to take down all that info...but she talks quickly and it's a challenge to take notes on anything else.  Overall, good prof.
                
                   Great class, great teacher.  Easy to follow and an interesting subject matter. But you need to be good at taking notes, because she goes pretty quickly. However, she follows the book pretty closely. If you look over your notes and skim the book before the tests, you will do fine. I also took a 400-level class with this professor and loved it.
                
                   I don't like her. She just lectures about personal experiences and they have nothing to do with the test. Her method of giving a test review before any chapters are taught is faulty in my opinion. If you take this class, have a voice recorder.
                
                   I took Intl Conflict. He is passionate about the subject, & is highly resourceful. He made this class my hardest one at A&M but the best.  I'm not gonna lie, the reading is heavy but its worth it. I learned so much in his class alone then my previous POLS put together! He cares abt his students n wants you to learn. You get what you put in.
                
                   interesting course, talks too fast in lecture
                
                   He is super interested in the subject, and it really shows. He is incredibly interesting, but his readings aren't. He really helps prepare you for law school. I would take another class from him. For tests his readings help, but I barely read, its more about his lectures so try and be there.
                
                   His lectures were usually very interesting, and this is coming from someone who hates political science. I never once read, only studied for the last exam, and managed to squeak by with a B. It's certainly a challenge to make A's on his tests, but not impossible. I'd definitely take his class again.
                
                   great prof! very interesting, funny and gets the class involved. Tests aren't easy but not super hard. reading the textbook is a must! although the contents of the class weren't very fun, the class over all was pretty interesting. i would recommend taking his class
                
                   He's really funny and makes the class easy to get through. Only has three tests which don't require much studying at all if you go to class or know the definitions to the terms on the review. Also gives alot of extra credit opportunities.
                
                   He's a really great speaker, and a really nice guy. His tests are pretty hard though. You pretty much have to go to class and study A LOT if you want to make an A on a test. He's very friendly and young, so he's easy to talk to. I highly recommend him!
                
                   Great orator and definitely makes a dull subject interesting. He's passionate about what he teaches and it makes all the difference. Is younger and relates class to real life easily. He is a good test maker, which means attendance and studying before a test are a must. No homework, but getting A's on the tests is challenging. Highly recommend.
                
                   He was boring and he made me fall asleep all the time because he talks super slow. He does know his stuff though. He didnt give reviews for tests but you can buy his book with the powerpoint slides to study from. I would not take him again
                
                   Professor Tucker was not a good professor. He rambled about random things during lecture and was difficult to follow. He was very clear about the format of his tests, but his questions were usually confusing. I studied and read for every test and would still leave not feeling confident  because he included questions we had not covered at all. 
                
                   Professor Tucker is a sarcastic, monotone lecturer. He's very clear about his expectations, and it's a three test course. Pay attention and READ HIS BOOK if you want to pass. Don't take his class at 8AM unless you're a morning person andor had copious amounts of caffeine before and during class.
                
                   Worst. Professor. Ever. Do not take at all costs. 
                
                   Tucker is a good prof, but I really hated this class because government bores me. The exams are very detail-based, so you have to read the book several times if you want to make an A. Definitely do his extra credit and attend lecture (some exam questions come from them). Courteous guy and treats students with respect. Sarcastic sense of humor.
                
                   Honestly, he's not that bad. If you come in to check what you got wrong on your test, he respects that. He also is super generous on extra credit quizzes so don't be stupid and skip those - mainly because his tests are pretty hard generally. I managed to get an A on the first one and two Cs following. The extra credit saved my grade, so DO THOSE.
                
                   Professor Tucker is obviously a smart man, but a good teacher, he is not.  I noticed that I learned less about government, and more about his own research.  Lectures are very difficult to follow, as the points he tries to make are muddled in with other useless info.  Test are absurdly difficult to the point where reading and studying wont cut it.  
                
                   He was okay, despite all the horror stories I had heard about him. The book is essential and I highly recommend going to lecture despite how dull, and sometimes awkward, they are. He has humor but it isn't enough and expect to know the syllabus to be your guide for the course. He will not  bump.   
                
                   Tucker is one of the worst profs I've ever had. He seems like he legit doesn't even care about the students. His lectures are super boring and he can be kinda mean if you ask him something that's already on his super long syllabus. His tests are also pretty specific and hard. Don't take him!!
                
                   Tucker's lectures are long and dull. He wrote the textbook so if you read it and still skip class you will pass the test. 
                
                   At the beginning of the semester Tucker seemed like he would be a great prof. DON'T LET THAT FOOL YOU. His lectures are extremely boring, and you have to memorize unimportant statistics from the book for the tests. He and another professor wrote the book, which is chock full of typos. There are no review sessions. 
                
                   He wrote the textbook that you will be using so everything is from the book. But the main problem I had was that his tests are rather hard, and I spent a lot of time reading the book. He gives a few extra credit but not much. His tests aren't curved, only 3 tests, no final. 
                
                   He is a good but tough professor. Lectures are boring w dry humor. Majority of  lecture has nothing to do w the chapter discussed. Tests are based from book & lecture so they can be hard. He doesn't answer any questions (tells you to refer to the syllabus). Overwhelming but SI sessions help. There are definitely easier professors for this class. 
                
                   DO NOT TAKE TUCKER! You have three tests and no final and no curve. All tests are about 40 question multiple choice and ask super specific questions. I went to lectures, attended tutoring, and read every chapter in the book and pulled out a C. Its alot of work just to pass and there is NO CURVE. what you get is what you get,
                
                   There are only three exams and no final. Most of the questions on the test are from the textbook (which he wrote). His lectures are extremely boring because he's monotone, takes long pauses, and often goes off topic. I barely understood what he would say. I definitely dreaded going to this class.
                
                   Not a terrible teacher but you have to go to lectures to do well on the tests... he wrote the book and asks alot of questions from it so you have to read it as well
                
                   Exams are difficult. In order to pass you must attend ALL lectures and take really good notes. I would never take his class again or even suggest other students take him. Most difficult POLS 207 professor at Texas A&M. 
                
                   Not an easy class! Test questions are confusing and lectures often contradict the book and vice versa. Not impossible to make a good grade but not easy at all.
                
                   This class was definitely not easy. Attendance was very important and you have to read the book. I attended a few SI's and would recommend going to these. He gives 3 points of extra credit. He is a good professor, but makes his exams very tricky.
                
                   I attended lecture but it was so boring I rarely ever paid attention. If you sit in the back it is hard to hear him sometimes. His tests are very detail oriented and most seemed like trick questions but it was nice that there wasn't a final. I outlined the whole book and took almost no notes and walked away with a B so it wasn't too bad.
                
                   just copy down her powerpoints and study them...you should be good
                
                   Soooo easy. Her tests are her lectures, and if you happen to read the book, then you are sure to get high As.  She also has a ton of real world experience.
                
                   wow; one of the most difficult courses i took last year... she was very morbid. her mood wasn't always up to par with the students. most of everything she taught wasn't in the book... difficult exams. SI's didn't even much help. but they were a lot better than the lecture itself. tried hard, still made a C. take the course if you enjoy gov't
                
                   BAD BAD BAD... monotone voice, doesn't take ANY info from her books. Her notes do NOT reflect the info. presented on the exams.
                
                   Dr. von Vacano's class is interesting. The class wasn't organized very well, and it was mainly discussion-based lectures with in-class debates here and there. Grades consist of 2 papers, weekly memos, a class presentation, and pop quizzes. His class was actually enjoyable and not very stressful; just make sure to participate, he's big on that.
                
                   took his Latin American Political Thought and Immigration ethics class, both excellent
                
                   Tests are difficult, don't cover the material lectured in class or in book (though he claims it does). His lectures come straight from the book so bring a highlighter! Grades are solely dependent on 4 test grades. Refuses to curve (even though much of the class fails the tests).
                
                   Caldwell is a great teacher.  Only 3 tests (for both classes I've taken with him) and no final.  Lots of class discussions and participation.  He gives a ton of reading but he gives a review for the test so reading before getting the review is kind of pointless.  NOT EVERYTHING THAT IS ON THE TESTS IS ON THE REVIEW.  Would recommend to anyone.  
                
                   Speak up in his class and he will love you.  Easy to get distracted with computer games during his lectures but really helps to pay attention.  
                
                   A really great guy! His accent is what makes his class difficult to understand but it does not really matter as you may ask him questions and he will explain to the best of his ability. You will get used to his accent but over all he is funny sometimes and knows what he is talking about. Just read, study and youll be ok! BLESS
                
                   He has a thick accent which is weird at first, but you get used to it. The class seems like it is going to be hard, but as you get into it it really isn't that bad. If you pay attention and review for the tests you'll do fine. There are also somewhat pop quizzes.
                
                   Tests are not easy. I made an A but never made an A on an exam. I got really high grades on the Reflection Papers. Discussion questions are several questions wrapped into one. Overall the instructor was helpful and the class was very interesting. He gave an extra credit discussion question at the end for about 25 points I think.
                
                   He is hard to understand AT FIRST due to his accent. Give it about a week. I read the first few chapters, then all together stopped reading for the classes; I still got a B. I recommend sitting up front because he is soft spoken. You lose points for absences- more than 5 you lose 5 points off your final grade. (10- 10 points off)
                
                   Good teacher. As long as you meet his criteria and expectations you could easily get an A. 
                
                   Dr. D is the reason I changed my major to Political Science. I had her for several courses while completing my Bachelor's and my Master's at TAMUC. She is an awesome instructor. Pay attention, take notes, READ! She is always there to help if you needed it, but you had to work for your grade; no "gimmes" here!
                
                   Dr. D. is an awesome professor. Extremely knowledgeable and willing to take the additional time to help students better understand the world of PoliSci. Her classes are not hard if you are willing to do the work.
                
                   Her test are real hard specially for this class international economy. The test was in essay form 5 questions and you had to practically memorize most of the notes. Overall she is teaches great. Very nice lady. I just wish her test where much easier multiple choice preference. The bad thing about the clas you only have four assigments if you do bad in one you are in trouble no extra credit no nothing
                
                   Great instructor. Makes cases interesting. Class was fast-paced but by the end felt I had really accomplished a lot.  If you show you care about the subject matter, and talk to her, she will do all she can to help you pass.
                
                   awesome class, awesome teacher...so lucky to have had her.
                
                   JoAnn DIGeorgio is tha bom
                
                   Dr. D is an amazing teacher. She really knows what she's talking about, and she really cares about the students. If you need anything, just go to her and she'll help you out. She barely uses the books. Her tests come directly from the notes, so be sure to take good ones. She usually gives a study guide before every test.
                
                   She is helpful, informative and encourages every opinion. Unfettered thought as Dr, Mayo Called it.
                
                   If you ask her if there's anything you can do if you get a bad test grade she tells you to go find the pages numbers in the book and find the right answer and write the page numbers down and then she gives you a better grade.  Just make sure you ask her for help and she will pass you.  She sticks out her tounge everyso often..disturbing.. very nice
                
                   Nice lady.  SHe is very into the subject and knowlegable.  And she is quite hot for her age!
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Take her class. You'll be a better person b/c of it. She spent much time in the Md East Region. She truly knows her stuff!
                
                   I love Dr D as she is affectionately known by her &quot;favorites&quot; She is very intelligent and expects her students to try hard and ask questions. Whether you are interested in the topic or not, treat her with respect and pay attention and you'll do well
                
                   Take some else if possible!
                
                   She is cool as****. Liberal Democrat, but has fun with all students (liberals and conservatives). Her grading is not bad at all. Likes to test you on her lectures and not so much from book reading.
                
                   Very Liberal but doesn't interfere with grading
                
                   I have not noticed her bias as mentioned by some individuals here.  I think she is quite fair, and grades accordingly.  I can almost assure you that she does not pick favorites.  Great professor, great help, and very knowlegeble.
                
                   She does play favoriates.
                
                   While being one of her &quot;cronies&quot;,also known as a student and friend,I think she's one of the finest professors on campus.Yeah,she's liberal, but she's also a neat lady with alot to teach students.I did fine in her class and I'm conservative.Take
                
                   I was hesitant at first to take her class but she has been very helpful, and her class is very fast paced.
                
                   Amazed that so many students bordered on the negative in their reviews. They must have taken mandatory, core courses as Freshman. Where Embry's passion lies is in political philosophy - emphasis on deconstructing national socialism...His courses are amazing, more than challenging, and something students will think about long after completion. A+
                
                   He was a good professor, talked to much and slow, but his quizes were simple . his test required an amount of studying.
                
                   He is adorable.  His lectures are a bit disoriented but, thankfully, his tests mostly come from the text. He is very helpful and a stickler for attendance.  If you aren't there, your grade will reflect it.
                
                   Great guy. Knows his stuff, open to excuses/good reasons for missing class. Allows you to use notes on a lot of stuff, expects a lot but gives a lot as well
                
                   good prof... 3 chances to turn in late work or make up missed exams... always a big help... lots of reading but can use notes on most pop quizzes...
                
                   If you want to be lectured to by a pompous liberal -- Elliot is your man. For overdemanding expectations and a liberal agenda -- enroll now!
                
                   Good teacher. A little to happy with the podum. Good with grades and make-up.
                
                   reality was discussed for the first 4 weeks of class be sure you know what reality is    cool teacher
                
                   He knows his politics...lots of lecture and reading, but fair.  You get three chances per semester to turn in work late with no penalty.  ALWAYS a big help.  Can use notes on pop quizzes. Sense of humor.  Great professor.
                
                   I learned alot in this class
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Taught me a lot about the balance between liberty and order.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Very distant.  Didn't seem to care very much.
                
                   Liked his class in the summer. Talked a lot about the events of the day because we are in the middle of a war much like Vietnam. He is very intelligent and although he is slightly liberal, not so much so that he should offend anyone.
                
                   This is suppose to be a class about Vietnam but all he does is talk about politics. He had a review for a test, said it would be over certain things and the day of the test none of the questions were about what he went over.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Best teacher I ever had.
                
                   Very interesting to listen to, however grades tough on his essays! Know's what he's talking about, but doesn't always go over book in class, talks about current events of the day!
                
                   I absolutely adored my class with Professor Gosbee. Her lectures were interesting and well thought out. She incorporated interesting things into class, such as films and a trip to the museum. Her papers were fairly graded and easy to pass. Overall, great class, great professor, highly recommend. 
                
                   I got a C in this class and he never read a single paper or project I turned in. I worked very hard on them, turned them in on time, and followed all of the specifications, and he never even cared enough to read them because I wasn't one of his favorites. He picks favorites, and if you're not one of them, forget about getting a good grade.
                
                   Dr. Herndon is a master of his craft.  An exceptional and inspirational leaderteacher.  He connects with you and clearly enjoys what he does.  Will take again.  
                
                   A tough because you will not know what your exact grade is unless you calculate it yourself, attendance is mandatory! He is kind of reasonable, gives extra credit opportunities and tries to be far. Your class notes is your TEST REVIEW, in every sense of the word. Please study!
                
                   This was an amazing class. It's a little tough but if you take notes and pay attention his class is very engaging and he's smart and charming! Don't be late and don't skip class. The lectures are easy to follow and he has a great sense of humor. Not to mention handsome as all get out!
                
                   Dr. Herndon was one of my favorite professors. Yes, he is very sarcastic but he only gets condescending when people disrespect him. If he sees you respect him and you are trying to do well in the class, he will be extremely helpful and nice. The exams are tough and I usually hate political science, but he made it interesting and I learned so much.
                
                   I highly recommend this teacher. The only reason I didn't make an A is that I didn't study in advance. He knows his stuff so well, and has organized his notes so meticulously- you can make your notes outline style with headings and subcategories, all numbered. Didn't think I would like a government class, turned out to be a favorite!
                
                   HANDS DOWN THE BEST PROFESSOR I'VE EVER HAD. If you takes notes, act like an adult, are up on current events, and know who Doctor Who is you will be fine. Don't piss him off by being juvenile, or being late for class. Looking forward to next semester.
                
                   The man is as hot as he is brilliant. His lectures are intriguing and you will walk away with so much personally and educationally. It is worth working hard in his classes. If you enjoy pop culture and thinking for yourself, this is the professor to get!
                
                   Herndon is brilliant.  The haters hate cause he can rebutt ANYTHING...he is incredibly intelligent and self-assured and it comes across as a rock solid lecture.  He also likes to explore random topics introduced in lecture.  If I had to sum the class up in one word:  Unforgettable.
                
                   I would call him the nutty professor.  Maybe a little too into himself at times.  Attendance is very important as well as reading the text books.  Mixed opinions about him.  Can be kind of condescending, sarcastic, and make people feel stupid.  His closing speech of class did make a person almost tear up.
                
                   Excellent! I thoroughly enjoyed his class as well as his humor.
                
                   I have to be honest, this guy try's to be funny...he's not. You can NEVER tell when he's joking or when he's serious. He is VERY condescending and pompous. I even hate the way he talks, very monotone and overly smart. If possible, STAY AWAY FROM THIS PROFESSOR!
                
                   Mr.Herndon is a great professor. It was nice to go to a class where the professor was engaged and made the class interesting.You definitely have to keep up with current events and read the book though.
                
                   Overall, great teacher! He's funny, makes the material interesting and relates it to current events. Go to class! Take good notes! Most of his tests are from the notes/lectures rather than the book. You're guaranteed to learn a lot in any class he teaches.
                
                   One of the best professors at this university. Period. His lectures are so engaging, but YOU MUST TAKE NOTES. And you must really stay on top of your current events. Also, NEVER miss a class. He is difficult, but let me tell you, you will learn more in that class than you will in almost any class you ever take. SUPERB professor!!
                
                   His class wasn't nearly as difficult as the horror stories I heard before taking him. He requires a great deal of reading, and good notes are almost a must. He is funny, very intelligent, and quite interesting. You have to work hard, but it's not ridiculous. You definitely have to earn your grade. I wouldn't suggest skipping class, ever.
                
                   Honors class. He is hilarious. I loved going to class cause of the stuff he would rant about. KNOW YOUR CURRENT EVENTS!! Quizes in class about what is going on in the world. Watch the news, read the paper. The assignments and tests are a little hard but he does everything he can to help.
                
                   Very good professor.  Sometimes he is to smart, and never try to go against what he says or he will make you look like a ****.  Tests are fairly difficult, just make sure you read the textbook.  Lectures are very interesting but you take notes on what he says, no powerpoints and rarely uses the board.
                
                   wonderful teacher, very funny. and yes for all you women who care, hes a good looking guy
                
                   Absolutely my favorite professor!! He is brilliant! I'm not even a Political Science major, and I take every class I can get into that he teaches (I'm in my third and counting!) He's funny, charming, and he obviously loves his subject. He's also flat out adorable. I'd take his class just to watch him, but he's oh, so much more than a pretty face!
                
                   Lectures are a bit difficult to follow - but the book itself is confusing so... Likes to give quizzes mostly for attendance. He was an okay instructor but probably wouldn't take his class again.
                
                   Syllabus is on point. Weekly discussions which are repetitive. There are only so many ways you can rewrite what everyone else is writing. Easy tests and quizzes. 
                
                   Three exams, weekly quizes and weekly discussion questions that require 4 additional comments on other students posts for a total of 5 post per week with minimum word counts for each; a bit excessive but it counts towards 15% of your grade. The syllabus is clear and he does not deviate from it. 
                
                   I took the online course and it was easy. There are discussion boards that you MUST participate in and they can be rather challenging. There are weekly chapter quizzes on Fridays and a total of 3 exams throughout the semester. If you study, read, and keep up then you can easily pass this course. 
                
                   Dr. King was rude and not helpful. I sent him an email asking for clarification on an assignment and his response was very abrasive and seemed rude. I thought his class was okay but I didn't like him.
                
                   along with other students this class is hard. Exam are timed but time end soon. Is a stickler regarding discussions. Grading scales/crazy! I would not recommend this instructor. Take class as another location and passed it.
                
                   very boring class. doesn't try to make it interesting. just rambles fact after fact after fact after fact
                
                   We had 3 books in this class. all were contadictory to others texts. His test are some of the hardest i have every taken.Expect reading quizzes. Does not care if you pass or fail. Not a fan. will not take him again.
                
                   This semester was the 3rd time I've taken him. I love his classes! He is difficult, but fair. Once you figure out his test style it gets better. He's very consistent. He's very helpful during office hours.He teaches straight from the book. He really knows his stuff. Take classes dealing with the courts if you can. It's his specialty.
                
                   This guy is cold. Most emails sent back when asking questions were short and seamed disrespectful. This is what is wrong with professors these days for online courses.
                
                   Liked class, I was learning and then, boom, at the end of the class he failed me!  Strange! I thought I was doing ok!
                
                   King is very focused on the book.  Whatever book he assigns, there will be assigned reading and then he will lecture over the reading so if you don't read, its no big deal.  His tests are hard to get an A on, but its also hard to fail because he tries to keep grades in the middle.  He doesnt allow very much class discussion.
                
                   I had him at UT Dallas- His attitude really reminded me of Cartman! He is cool with some people, but when class is over he cuts ties and doesn't care to stay in touch. Something really bad happened to this guy and affected his world outlook.  He's cool one day, then a man with vengeance the next. Take him if you dare, but beware!
                
                   Took this class online. Tests come straight from the vocabulary in the text. So be sure to read. It is also important to listen to the online lectures because they help with the essay question. Overall pretty easy if you do what you should like any other college class. Do what he has in the syllabus and you can assuredly swing a B.
                
                   clear lectures.  easy to understand what is important to learn.  straight forward tests without trick questions.  gives hints about what to study for exams.  overall, very easy to do well.  read, go to lecture, get an A!
                
                   Don't take her unless you have to. Lectures were worthless, tests came from the book. I learned more in h.s. govt class than from her. She's very opinionated and didn't like it when people tried speak their own opinions in class. The dept should really think about not letting ga's teach or if they do at least make sure they can teach.
                
                   Would definitely pick her as an instructor again. She didn't like the textbook so didn't use it probably wont be the case in the future. Her class is making me consider changing my major.. She for sure held up her end of the deal, goes out of her way to make sure material is understood - if you don't do well it's all on you.
                
                   Very opinionated. You won't agree with everything she says, but she will try to help you do well in her class.
                
                   I loved her and her no bs attitude. Yeah she's tough on everyone but do the work, read the book, take notes and you'll be alright. I dreading taking polisci but from day one I knew she was going to make it bareable for me. I'm taking her for PSCI 212 too.
                
                   interesting discussions.  not afraid to tell you her opinion.  tests a little difficult, but she gives extra credit.  writing assignments vague, and slow to return grades, but overall a decent prof.
                
                   Lenington is hilarious. Very hard to figure out. Her assignments are interesting, but her tests are scary. Not sure how I did as well as I did but in the end she's not as bad as she comes across at first. If you have any interest in the subject at all you'll do fine.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   The only word that comes to mind....****!!!!
                
                   She's a crazy teacher and I love it! Very hard tests, but she does curve. Don't take this class if you're easily offended. She makes class enjoyable and fun. Just listen and you will learn, the grade is irrelevant.
                
                   She's a hard-ass, but she's entertaining.  Just remember, she offends everyone.  She's not targeting any particular group of people with her rants.  Her tests are hellish, but if you know the material, you'll be okay.
                
                   be prepared to study and come to class. we weren't required to take the final if we had a A. not sure if she still does that
                
                   I dig the mullet.  Great teacher, just take notes she repeats herself so it's easy to catch the material.
                
                   This class never stayed focus which made it impossible to take notes.  It is the only C I have recieved.  Also her tests are 20 short answer questions with multiple parts.  Very difficult.
                
                   Lenington really knows her stuff. Go to class, have an open mind and read the materials. Tests can be hard, but study hard and you'll get a good grade. I was very pleased with what I learned in a summer course. Try her out, you never know.
                
                   Great professor and she knows her stuff. She enjoys her job and it shows.  Very cherful in class and as long as you take good notes, study and pay attention you should do well in her classes.  She is awesome!!!!!!!
                
                   Tough tests but I learned a LOT from her class. Definately keeps it interesting
                
                   Not an easy A but still possible if you study listen take notes. Her test are pretty hard but her super curving and even curving your end average to your highest test grade make her class much easier. You learn more than you could of imagined. A++ Teacher
                
                   She will bust your ass daily. Please don't say anything stupid, she will always laugh at you. She probably reads these and makes class harder just for her kicks.  She does know her stuff, though. I suggest Newhouse unless a poly sci major.
                
                   She was very hard & seems to like to make people look stupid.
                
                   She can drive you crazy with some of her comments and it can be very entertaining when that one hard-headed kid in class tries to argue with her, but you will learn more about government and politics in this class than you ever thought possible.
                
                   They're all lies. Lies, I tell you. Unless you're a poly-sci major, avoid this chick at all costs. She knows her stuff too well, and if political science isn't your forte, she'll annoy the hell out of you.
                
                   I didn't like the class because I felt he projected his own opinion so much. I love learning about government but his constant bashing of my views put a huge damper the class for me. Easy enough but the only grades you get are quizzes and exams. No homework. Good if you hate hw, bad if you're a bad tester. Democrates and good testers will like him.
                
                   Took him for international relations. It is his first semester as a doctor, therefore he developed as the semester went on. He is EXTREMELY passionate in what he teaches and loves his subject. I would take him again solely for his passion and ability to help students. Not in office usually, but will respond quickly over email. 
                
                   I didnt know or want to know about politics, but now I will be more likely go out to vote. He gives weekly quizzes that are used to make the exams. You really do not have an excuse to do poorly in his class. He provides loads of opportunities for extra credit and allows you to lock in your grade before the final. 
                
                   Teaches off of his own knowledge, not once did we use the book we were told to buy. Does not know what he is doing. Horrible professor.
                
                   Uninformed about present events and constantly unclear.
                
                   The whole class turns in assignments wrong. That means that the whole class constantly must have misheard her, misunderstood. I have never seen a teacher with such little faith in her students and students with so little faith in a teacher.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Opinionated! Intolerant of opinions contrary to her own. Very hard on absences for ANY reason, including school functions. Superb notetaking required. Don't neglect reading assignments if you want to pass.
                
                   She has a military background and has worked for senators and other public officials in Washington. She knows political science, but she is hard! Be prepared, study and take good notes on her lectures, you may not pass all her test and quizes either.
                
                   She is a GREAT professor.  Very fun and interesting.  Do your work and study.  You may not get an A but if you try you should pass.
                
                   Grades very hard
                
                   Good instructor. Fun in class, BUT... do not come in unprepared! If you fail, it will be your own fault.
                
                   She is very good in-class.  Grades teh hardest I have ever seen.  But alot of fu
                
                   DR. Newhouse is by far the best teacher I have had. You will leave his class with knowledge of history, not just information on the tests.
                
                   He was the best teacher ever
                
                   Dr. Newhouse was a cool professor he was serious about his students learning and he gave yu all the attention yu needed to ensure yu success ans he will work with you. I HATE political science bt Newhouse worked with me and i got a B
                
                   HE IS THE BEST TEACHER. EVEN THOUGH ENGLISH WASN'T HIS BEST CLASS, HE WAS VERY GOOD.
                
                   He is the man!! I hated history with a passion until I entered his gates. He made this class interesting and easy to follow. Do the study guides he gives, and you will get an A!
                
                   Dr. Newhouse (VonNeuhaus) rocks! I absolutely dreaded taking this class, but he has proven to me that history can be interesting and even FUN!  Made an A - love him!  What's with all the earrings, Doc&#63;
                
                   Wonderful, wonderful,wonderful..take him all you can..He's the best
                
                   Dr. Newhouse is Awesome.  This was an online class and it was very interesting.  He gives study guides before the Quiz's and Exams that are a must.  Read the text book, particpate in online discussion, study and you will pass this fun class.
                
                   Newhouse/Vahnhaus is a wonderful professor. He is interesting and I wish we had more time to just leisurly learn from him. He gives out study guides which include a lot to study, but if you can follow his lead you will do wonderfully in his class.
                
                   Dr. Newhouse is very Passionate about what he is telling you. He is fun and makes the class a pleasant place to be. Might get a little mad but does'nt harp on things.
                
                   he's a very energetic and fun teacher with a passion for the subject. his notes are crazy, so write fast, but most of it is straight from the book anyway. his tests can be very hard, but if you read each chapter carefully, you'll do fine.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   He is a great and helpful teacher. The secret to this class is to print out the ch. reviews from the faculty page, and he will go over each thing on there so you will know exactly what to study for the tests
                
                   It's a-ok
                
                   Very energetic guy who loves what he teaches.  His tests are easy, as long as you've taken notes and read the chapters.
                
                   this guy is so funny its like being at a televised  debate  we write alot of interesting papers
                
                   GREAT TEACHER. It is so hard to make history interesting but this man has mastered it. He gives you notes and all you have to do is listen and fill in the blank then study those for the tests. The tests can be a little tricky but its worth it.
                
                   Multiple choice tests with study guides!
                
                   Dr. Newhouse is very energetic and a great professor. He is serious about education, learning and life. Good transition class for Freshman. He wants to see you succeed. Tests are lecture based, so don't take him, if you're not gonna go..
                
                   I absolutely love her! She is my all time favorite professor. Her class is straight forward, her lectures are interesting, she's funny, and pretty darn gorgeous if you ask me! Take her class!
                
                   Very good professor. Tells you exactly what she wants and expects. If you don't make a good grade I'm her class it's your own fault.
                
                   Professor does not explain specifics as to what she wants in assignments, but then grades very hard and particular. She does not use the dry erase board or hardly any source of visual aid whatsoever. Instead she leaves student to fend for themself, then makes you feel stupid in class when you ask a question at certain times.
                
                   This professor was not available for questions nor did she provide prompt feedback.  Once grades were received, the comments were class generic and provided no insight as to why (what was correct v. missed for that grade, etc.).  Although the topics were interesting, this professor was horrible due to inadequate communication with students.
                
                   This class was very easy and I learned alot also...The tests are easy if just study I passed with ease. It sometimes felt like a high school because of how easy it was!
                
                   No Comments
                
                   I have all the tests/notes from PSci 220/221, if you need them then go to my profile and tell me.  This guy is one of the best teachers i have ran across.  He's smart, funny as hell, and has a cool accent.  His tests are easy, his notes are long...but they are all on a power point, and you don't really need them that much anyway.....the worst thing about his class are the stupid web assignments, but they just are boring, and not hard.  Overall, one of the best teacher's in school.
                
                   He's a good teacher who knows what he is talking about. From Nigeria, so his accent can be troublesome at times. His tests are so easy a monkey could pass them. His Power Point slides have everything that will be on the test, and he gives them to you if you ask.
                
                   If you come to class and read the reviews, you will do fine in his class.  I highly recommend him for Poli Sci.
                
                   Great guy, easy A if you show up every day. A little hard to understand at first, but it gets easier.
                
                   He is very willing to sacrifice his time and energy to help students...even his lunch hours!!! Really unbelievable.  He loves his job and firmly stands for what he believes in.  He has sincere motives and gives everybody a chance to be heard.
                
                   He is very democratic and very pro black. Other than that, he is very easy and you have little problems with him.
                
                   Hands down one of the best in the business and he gives both sides you never can figure out his political side. Class is interesting tests are easy if you read do the loads of extra credit lots of terms but worth it.
                
                   Great Professor. He is very passionate about his work and he will make sure you understand what he is talking about. he provides alot of extra credit. The only bad thing is the extra credit terms he gives for each test its alot of terms but its worth it. I highly recommend this professor you will learn much more than you think with society from him
                
                   Very good professor! I loved going to his class every day! He is very neutral and shows both sides of the issue. I still don't know what his political standing is. He gives an extra credit opportunity every other week. Very interesting class with relevant discussions that apply to every teenager. Loved the class!
                
                   Excellent professor.  Very interesting class and missed our discussions after class was over.  The level of difficulty of this class is up to you.  If you pay attention, take notes, read text, you can do fine.  He offers extra credit which is great for people who may be bad test takers. His great classroom management provides for optimal learning.
                
                   Best teacher I have ever had. End of story. If he taught every singe class at the University Id never leave school.
                
                   Dr.Rodriguez is a great professor his tests are not tricky and he gives plenty of extra credit opportunity. He is funny and he kept me up to date with the news. Recommend.
                
                   She never responds to e-mails and is weeks behind in grading. When she does actually grade your discussion post she will mark you off, but not ever tell you why. Quiz, discussion, and comments every single week even if there is a exam. Communication is non-existent, and if you have an important question don't even bother to ask. 
                
                   Pretty good teacher, but she never grades our stuff. When she does, she will not tell you why you made the grade you made.
                
                   Although the class itself was easy, the professor was difficult to get in contact with when needed and her grading was unclear. She never gave feedback when she gave low grades, and it was impossible to ask her for any help because she never responded to messages, and when she did, it was very unclear. 
                
                   This teacher was unable to keep up with our online class. We were months ahead of her. Grading was always behind, responses to our emails were rare, and generally... the class was rough. 
                
                   Discussion post every week + quiz + occational exams + occational essays
                
                   This class can be easy but often frustrating. She isn't organized and we often had to wait MULTIPLE weeks to get grades back for things.  If you have an important question don't email because she never responds within a timely manner. She wasn't good at understanding problematic issues with her class. Good Luck. 
                
                   Mrs. Temple is a fabulous professor! She is helpful, encouraging and very nice. I learned a lot in her online class. Her expectations were very clear and at times, she went above and beyond to help me if I missed an assignment which was really unexpected. She always answers emails promptly as well. GREAT professor and I HIGHLY recommend her class!
                
                   One of my favorite professor ever. So kind and helpful! If you go over what he tells you, you will get an easy A. 
                
                   Class my not be the easiest, but the teacher is great!
                
                   Aweful aweful aweful. Didn't seem to care if we understood or not. When the class got bored they began to talk. He wouldn't say anything to hush them, he would just talk faster. When I asked him for help he told me to just read the syllabus again. We didn't know our grades until finals were posted.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Tended to babble, but was a good instructor on the whole. Easy tests. Made an A without making much of an effort...
                
                   Pretty easy class.  I thought the tests were not that bad.  I got an A. Just show up to class and do the work and you'll be fine.
                
                   He Was Very Interesting at times..I really enjoyed his jump around lectures.
                
                   Very witty and laid back. He is one of the most willing professors to work with and help his students. Great prof.
                
                   HE coems off hard at first but grades leisurly. he there if you ask him and his test are basicly the review
                
                   Dr. Billeaux's lectures are forever long and boring.  It was so hard to sit trough.  The class was hard! Too Hard!
                
                   He was a good teacher...but he is very monotoned! i couldnt stay awake...but word of advice jus show up to class and get the notes...
                
                   This teacher is interesting to listen to ... however the notes u take in class YOU WILL NEED so don't miss!
                
                   he is actually not bad don't be afraid to take him if you keep up with the readings weekly you will do fine. WARNING: study for the multiple choice 10x as much as you do for the essays.
                
                   He's very...um...unclear. Plus some of his &quot;graders&quot; are distracting. I don't recommend this class for those who don't get the concept of Poly Sci because he's not very helpful. I'm an A student and struggled for a C. He's educated but confusing
                
                   Hard teacher, one of those that goes from point a to point d and skips the b and c, doesn't help for students who don't already know about politics in the US.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Boring class, but he's a decent teacher. Can be difficult for people who don't &quot;get&quot; government.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   He sucks!
                
                   Keep up with what your grades should be.. they totally dropped me two letter grades in my final grade, when I was stunned- I demanded a recount and whoops THEIR mistake.. their excuse was they have lots of students.  I wonder how many people this has happened to where they just take the grade. Just a warning.
                
                   I thought this class would be so boring but suprising it wasnt to bad, teacher is funny, tests can be difficult if you dont study. attendence is 20% of your grade.If you stay a lil longer after test he will help you ;)
                
                   Cons: His tests are a bit tricky at first, you'll get the hang of it. He will call you out if you talk. Big time note taking class and constant speaker. Pros: He favors the ladies, wink wink*, ladies he'll hook you up real good. He helps a lot at the end of exams.
                
                   Took take state and local gov. with bezdek, class seems a little hard a first, he trys to intimidate the class but it actually was relativly easy, gives reviews before test,and lectures don't put you to sleep.
                
                   He is pretty straight forward and easy to understand.  You have to be able to type or write reeeeeally fast to keep up with his notes.
                
                   Bezdek is extremely opinionated, funny now and then, confusing tests. 4 to 5 page papers.
                
                   Fairly easy class. Does babble on about the same stuff though and doesn't hide his political bias very well.
                
                   Great person will help with anything
                
                   This class was easy and informative if you like government. Use notes for test and you'll be fine. He's a fun teacher and the people I saw who disliked him seemed to be the ones who don't understand that professors aren't there to always agree with you.
                
                   Good teacher, keeps the subject interesting and is easy to understand.  Test aren't extremely hard, just need to pay attention in class and have good attendance.  Not alot of assignments but the few he gives are informational.
                
                   If I see that he is teaching a class, I sign up for it. No matter what he is teaching, it is good. How many teachers can say they do that&#63; A good choice if you really want to learn the information.
                
                   i Aced his classes.. the Key...   always say vote along party lines, and demographics... this fool said law school wasnt for me..  Ha, ha, went to law school, obtained masters degree and own my own business..
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Decent if you like staying on one topic the entire semester. Stay on his good side. The tests are a joke.
                
                   Decent if you like staying on one topic the entire semester. Stay on his good side. The tests are a joke.
                
                   One of my favorite professors while I was there and made an interesting class even more interesting.
                
                   Confusing at first but he makes you understand it
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Facinating, thought provoking, and always interesting to listen to.
                
                   One of the most brilliant professors I have ever had the opportunity to be in a classroom with.  Take any course with this prof.
                
                   Honestly one of the most chill, yet helpful professors in TAMUCC. Hes always up and  ready to make you want to engage in his class, he makes everything super easy to understand and is undoubtably the reason i pass Dr. Smith POLS 2305  class. Professor Garcia is an amazing person, really caring, and will help you in just about any way he can. recom
                
                   As a freshmen you are required to take a Seminar, and i honestly was dreading it but after having Professor Garcia i would take his class again. He's very funny and friendly. His slide shows also help a lot for POLS exams. 
                
                   Professor Garcia is very helpful. Every freshman has to take First Year Seminar regardless, so I would recommend taking him. He helps you study for Political Science exams during his class. He takes the time to ask if you have any problems with school work and does power points to help his students out.
                
                   He's very funny and his slideshows are helpful in large lecture.
                
                   She gives quizzes just about class. The guy who helps her grade her papers grades harshly. Tests are hard and she makes you write essays for each one. She gives a lot of writing assignments 
                
                   While attendance isn't mandatory she does give out a quiz just about every class so it would probably be in your best interest to attend. Coming into this class I wasn't excited to learn about Texas politis but she does keep you engaged with her stories.Basically attend class and do the reading prior to class and you will definetly get a good grade
                
                   AMAZING! TAKE THIS CLASS!!!
                
                   Best political science professor at TAMUCC!!! Engages students in learning how state & local government function. I had no interest in political science prior to taking her course and ended learning so much. She grades fair and doesnt trick students into failing. I suggest her to all my friends.
                
                   She's a lot of fun. Really approachable, loveable, and fun to watch. LOVES THE SUBJECT. You will learn a lot. Easy if you read the book and attend the class.
                
                   your class is a check in the box who cares
                
                   If politics are boring and uninteresting in anyway to you, do not take this professor. She is insane about politics. There is a quiz everyday you meet and mandatory notes when speakers come. I never knew someone could be so enthralled in politics until I met this woman.
                
                   She is amazing! She tries to make the class as interesting as possible and gets into the class herself. She brings in guest speakers and tries to let you out as early as possible!
                
                   She is very enthusiastic about politics.  She will encourage you to get involved a lot.  Reviews for the tests consist of her telling you to read the book.  The tests themselves were not that hard, even though they lack a good review.
                
                   Professor Hallock was just great. She was understanding, unbelievably enthusiastic, and just as kind and sweet outside of class. No matter the question, she would take the time to explain it. She also linked history to current events in an insightful manner. Not too hard if you pay attention. A no-brainer- take the class!
                
                   Great prof...easy to follow and not boring at all. I had her for the 2.5 hour class and she made time fly
                
                   She has a passion fr what she teaches. Test are not to hard as long as you study and pay attention in class you dont have to read the book to much. Her powerpoints are from the book and not very good so i wouldnt take notes off them just listen. She gives alot of extra credit and enourages partcipation.
                
                   she is very enthusiastic. she has a lot of energy and loves her job and shows it in her lectures. she gives weekly quizzes but they are easy and gives extra credit to help the students boost up their grade. i enjoyed taking her and listening cuz she tries to make jokes and get you involved. i would recommend anyone to take her.
                
                   I liked her personality and smile.  She has a weekly quiz from the material in the book.  If she wasn't married, I would marry her.
                
                   She is so adorable! She has a great passion for politics and it shows in her lectures. I had her for a 2 hr. class but she made it easy to get into the class. Her charisma gets you excited about learning! I even started to watch CNN &amp; CSPAN!!!
                
                   Mrs. Hallock loves politics and it comes across. She is fun to listen to because she almost convinced me that voting matters by her enthusiasm. She gives extra credit essays that make it easier to earn a high grade.  Her tests follow the book so you have to read it and not just count on your notes.
                
                   He does tend to stray from topic a bit, and often talks about some of his modern political favorites during much of class.  But overall he isn't bad, if you are somewhat knowledgeable on our political system and are good on logic, you should pass his tests.
                
                   Dr. Hain, as mentioned, has a hard time staying focused with lectures. Often talks about himself. Final test was worth 40% of grade! And he discusses very little of what you need to know in class, thinks it is your responsibility to know the material. Just study the textbook. Sometimes, he passes out a sign in sheet.
                
                   He is a very good guy.The only way you can fail his tests is if  you do not go to class.I would recommend him.
                
                   Random thoughts...never stays on track.  Interesting guy, but does not teach well.  Great stories from &quot;political battles&quot; but just doesn't prepare you for tests.  Tests are poorly written multi-choice and short answer.
                
                   attendance is not mandatory but most of his tests come from in class discussions
                
                   This class was so cake. I didn't even go to the classes, just did learnsmarts and studied the day before the test and still ended with an A. The profes is super chill as well so don't trip if you need help.
                
                   His class was so easy! Literally your whole class grade is not only determined by your exam grades, they're determined by the learnsmart grades (which are SUPER easy). DON'T forget to do those and you'll pass for sure. They're important. Exams are pretty easy if you study for them. Just look over learnsmart, it's also a great study guide.
                
                   Be sure to go to class and pay attention to his lectures, as its pretty word for word on the test. He also hates phones so I would not recommend sitting in class texting the whole time. He is pretty awesome! 
                
                   Go to the SI sessions and you will pass the class. Honestly you don't have to go to class to pass the exams as long as you go to the SI sessions but he will put some stuff on the exam that he says in class. I had him my fall semester and took him spring semester by choice because I knew his exam and grading style. I definitely advise taking him
                
                   Great professor. Funny and easy to understand. Go to class everyday, he gives examples that he puts directly on the test. Go to SI. If you go to class everyday and SI a few times before each test, you'll get an A.
                
                   prof is funny guy. he is always willing to help students. what really helped me succeed in his class was Tricia's si sessions. although class was boring at times, I would go to her sessions often, and she did a great job of helping us all understand what was going on in lecture. dr. huerta and tricia will make you love polysci!
                
                   This class is so easy its boring. Dr. Huerta's lectures are very straightforward, but directly from a power point. His test are very easy and the online assignments are very easy. 
                
                   Lol I went to three classes the entire semester, and got an A in the class. Do your homework, go to Tricia's SI sessions and you will do fine
                
                   I really enjoyed his class. He's very passionate about political science but is respectful of the students who aren't. I loved his lectures but missed a few and still got an A. He's very nice and understanding. Just do the connect assignments and go to SI sessions and you'll do great!
                
                   I didn't go to his lecture about half of the year and I still maintained a high B average. make sure you are reading the chapters though because it is very easy to fall behind. and the online assignments will effect your grade more than you think.
                
                   Easy to get a high B Just do the Reading Reactions and Americans Governing assignments (they are easy) Then study his notes and reviews for test. He is a pretty  cool guy, everything he does is to help us, for example, giving us time in class to share notes. Its very helpful. Take very good notes and pay attention and dont miss a class
                
                   Easy lecture, gets off topic so much that he doesn't finish the actual content. Tests are straight from the book and online Americans Governing assignments, which are a waste of time. Terrible class, easy A.
                
                   Great Professor. Tests and Quizzes are over the textbook material. READ!!! He hates talking/texting in class, and if you have a laptop, be sure you are only using it to take notes! He will make you put laptops and cellphones away or leave class if he sees them out. Very helpful to hardworkings students!
                
                   Read the book, because its hard to understand when he lectures.  The subject material is really boring, and the quizzes are over the reading material.  Even if you think you know the material, READ, because I promise you don't.  Vocabulary definitions don't help either.
                
                   class was horrible.  want an A&#63; just read the book. tests r a combo of the quizes. he dosn't take attendance.  no challenge @ all. nice guy, but he doesn't seem to know too much about his field.  how did he get his phd&#63;
                
                   You can tell he truly loves what he does. As long as you keep up with the reading and attend class regularly, you should have no problem at all. He doesnt take attendance, and his tests are pretty straight forward. He tends to ramble a little in his lectures, but if you take good notes, you should have no problem.
                
                   Easy class... testing online...
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Very awesome, lectures were kinda boring, but the class over all wasn't difficult as long as you showed up and did the readings.
                
                   class is boing, lectures suck, too many students
                
                   Super easy tests!!
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Very fun and funny!! And he was always interactive with all students. Never a dull moment in the class. He knows exactly what he is talking about.
                
                   Had him for political science, was very funny and made lectures fun. Info is on slide shows but i do suggests reading the book for the test. Very interesting lecture, keeps it interesting would take him again. Attendance isn't mandatory but i highly suggest it.
                
                   He is super funny! You have to read and study for the test. Aplia aren't that hard, but it's good to use your book. Attendance isn't mandatory but he'll pass out in class assignments when no ones there, but then he'll aslo offer make up papers for less credit. Great class!!
                
                   This is a very easy class. Attendance is not mandatory. Early warning quiz, in class assignments, aplia assignments online, and 4 exams (final included) over the semester. Reading the book is a must. Exams are easy as long as you read and use the study guides.
                
                   Read, Study, Do Homework. he is a great funny teacher and makes the class fun, just do what you got to do
                
                   great teacher, very enthusiastic. DO the work, read the book, easy to pass. I actually liked goin to class and i hate political science
                
                   Great professor! Attendance not mandatory but there are a lot of in class assignments so missing will hurt your grade. If you read the book and go to class it's an easy A.
                
                   Keep things interesting, very active, calls you out but nothing ever too bad, made political science not unbearable, If you keep up and study the study guides you'll do fine.
                
                   great teacher, knows his subject and actually makes lectures somewhat interesting, just keep up with the reading and it is a fairly easy class
                
                   this professor is pretty decent. keep up with the readings and you will be fine.
                
                   GREAT TEACHER! He's funny! Usually, starts the class out with a music video! Although he doesn't follow the book! His tests are a bit challenging! He's still one of my favorites that TAMUCC has to offer!
                
                   He is nice and has a lot humor. However, dosent teach the book so, you need to study by your self.
                
                   Great humor. This prof is awesome. Allows you to express your opinion and is willing to answer questions about current events. The tests for 2305 were easy IF you show up and take notes and actually read the book. Didn't have to even look at his review to ace the tests. Just read, and study the notes. He doesn't test over dates or people's names.
                
                   Jokes every once in awhile especially in the beginning, shows music vids from time to time.  Grades tough, especially if you dont show up it will be challenging to pass.
                
                   COOL GUY!  SHOWS MUSIC VIDS FROM TIME TO TIME BUT WHEN HE SHOWS THE EDUCATED VIDEOS MAKE SURE YOUR THERE!  HE WILL HAVE APPROX. 5 QUESTIONS ON IT!  HIS TEST IS KIND OF ROUGH.. HE SAID TO ME HE SETS UP ONE WRONG, ONE RIGHT ANSWER, ONE CLOSE TO BEING RIGHT, AND ONE EXACTLY RIGHT IN MULTI CHOICE SO BEWARE!
                
                   Awesome guy! He's really in-touch with younger students and his class is fairly easy. He can ramble at times but he never gets boring because he can be really funny at times. For tests, you can either do essay questions or multiple choice. I did the multiple choice. But just a tip: pay attention when reading the book if you do multiple choice.
                
                   Probably the best professor I have ever had.  My major was Biology until I had his class!  Now I am a Political Science major and couldn't be happier! A great professor, if you have the chance to take him, DO IT!
                
                   He doesn't stay on topic in lectures. The course is fairly easy to make a good grade in beacuse he gives other assignments, not just tests. All four exams (including the final) are supplemental. On the day of the final he also gives you the option to make-up one of your previous tests for a better grade after you finish the final. Good class!
                
                   His lectures tend to wonder, but are always interesting. Tests came from notes, but the  book also really helps on the essay questions. I would recommend taking him.
                
                   Good teacher, kinda nerdy, but in a fun way. Loves class participation and student's opinions. Doesn't take attendance. Tests were hard, but I didn't study much. Going to class is definitely helpful for the test though. Prepare to take lots of notes!
                
                   The only way you fail this class is if you do ZERO studying and don't go to class. Her test questions are straight from the book publisher, so just read the book, go over her study guides, and do the chapter quizzes on MindTap.
                
                   Not a hard class but you must apply yourself. she talks about her own achievements and laughs at her own jokes. reads off powerpoint and does not go into detail. you will need the book because you have to teach yourself! the si leader is way more helpful than the teacher. if you have the option, do not take  this class!
                
                   Personally I loved this professor. EVERY political science teacher has their own opinions and will show them so don't let the other comments scare you. You do have to actually read for the tests but she is a really nice professor and with everything online and extra help the testsclass is not that bad. 
                
                   Absolutely terrible professor.  Brags constantly about her own achievements and awards.  Laughs after everything she says.  Teaches her opinion only and not open to discussion.  Only reads from slides and will not expand and then gives detailed tests.  Can be very rude when you ask her questions.  Take someone else!!
                
                   She isn't very good at explaining and this class gets off topic a lot. To pass make sure you go to SI sessions and get the review from the leader and study that. Also do interactive quizzes through the textbook code. She only took attendance for my TR class on Thursdays
                
                   Good professor who is passionate about Political Science and has lots of experience in the business. Use the online course space practice quizzes to study for the tests.
                
                   So easy to get lost in her lectures. She constantly got off topic. Go to the S.I. meetings if you want to pass. She also isn't too nice. I made a 79.3 and she wouldn't round up to a B. 
                
                   You can easily get lost in her lectures and she doesn't stay on topic well. You teach yourself.
                
                   Pretty good professor, she tries to make class interesting. Not a heavy work load, mostly online homework. She laughs at her own jokes but she's not bad at all.
                
                   Lectures are unclear and assistance is limited. You don't need the book just follow the slides. Test are difficult and look over the internet site that she tells about to study for test.
                
                   I hated her. She is a terrible professor. Her teachings were inconsistent and confusing. HAD to do homework and computer projects in groups to pass the class. I loved POLISCI before I took her class. Considering changing my major now. RUDE and unhelpful when asking questions. I would never suggest her to anyone. The worst professor I've ever had.
                
                   Terrible professor. Powerpoints had no structure. She graded attendance. Her laugh was so annoying (Laughs at own jokes, not funny). Avoid taking her.
                
                   If she hadn't taken role I wouldn't have gone to class. I would have done better on my own. Her lectures are pointless, she reads what's on the slides and doesn't elaborate. She also gets off on tangen and can seem racially insensitive at times. She is the least helpful professor I've had, and I dont recommend taking her class if you have a choice.
                
                   Very easy class if you go. She gives you points for attendance. If you do the study guides she sends out before the test and actually go to class and take notes, youll have no problem getting a B or better in her class. She kind of has a dry sense of humor, but explains things pretty good.
                
                   Her class is pretty boring(doing this in class right now) but the tests are easy as long as you read the book and look over the lecture slides. A lot of people don't do well so she tried to make up for it by giving curves and extra credit. Attendance is random and her lectures are always off topic.
                
                   I had Dr. Rios for State and Local Government, U.S. Government, and currently for Introduction to Public Policy. For  State and U.S. Government, study the test for a week. Use the book website, read the chapters, and study the powerpoints. The attendance can help improve your letter grade by one letter. For her Intro to Public Policy class, write out the short answers and essats she gives you on the review. Do this a week before the test and you will get an A.
                
                   I liked Dr. Rios' class, she mixed it up with powerpoints, film clips, and current events. She made the class interesting and enjoyable by letting us express our views and at the same time listening to other's views.
                
                   This class was easy but not due to a good teacher. The stuff she covers isn't on the test plus she takes random attendance so u have to be there to hear her laugh @ her own jokes. I wouldn't recommend her to anyone. But if u do just read the book. Then u will pass.
                
                   Her class is easy, but that is the ONLY good thing in her class.  The rest... don't believe anything she says because she is bias and couldn't give the other point of view because she knows NOTHING about anything but her own view (and not interested in hearing the other side). There is no educating in her class, just one sided lecture/rants.
                
                   Dr.Rios is the BEST teacher I've had so far here at TAMU-CC...she talks about intresting topics...and her test are quite easy if you pay attention to her lectures...if you want a great teacher who allows classroom discussion you'll love her class!
                
                   So much reading required, you'll get a quiz after each chapter + an assignment or 2. After about 4-5 quizzes you get a test. Quizzes are difficult to pass and so are tests. Take lots of notes and write on the margins of your book! His lectures are useless. He's a good professor, but I would NOT take him again. BTW, everything is online.
                
                   Funny and energetic! Attendance is mandatory, notes are rarely posted online. Does respond to emails quickly, and you can always spot him at Coffee Waves on alameda!
                
                   Awesome teacher. Funny and keeps class engaging in conversation. Always welcomes your ideas and never puts down your views or opinions. Test use a lot from textbook and notes from class. Must attend class for notes because he doesn't put online.
                
                   Dr.Smith is a great professor. Hegives his quizzes and tests online. They are still difficult and force you to think but his lectures are very detailed and help with the online tests/quizzes. He is very laid back and I enjoyed going to his classes!He makes a boring subject fun!
                
                   Great professor I have no complaints was simple and easy
                
                   Her lectures are good, but the way she teaches is different. Dont get me wrong, shes a smart lady but she doesnt take a personal interest if youre having trouble in her class. She'll just tell you to focus on the study guide for the test, which by the way have nothing to do with the tests.
                
                   Easy just really have to study for the class
                
                   She is a good teacher, but the material is what you should expect. If you don't like politics you wont like the class, but she tries her best to make it exciting and interactive. Her tests (for my class) are taken online and are EASY. She is also really helpful and is willing to work with you. All-in-all, this was a good class and I recommend her.
                
                   very good professor, her powerpoints are great and well organized. she has an interactive lecture. she does use to book occasionally especially if you get any assignments ( triad). her test reviews are excellent! definitely help on the exams.
                
                   Hot. Easy. Clear. Can you get any better&#63;
                
                   Excellent Teacher. Just be sure to participate otherwise it gets boring.
                
                   Love this professor! Very helpful, caring, and gives study guides for her exams which you NEED to study to pass her exams. The exams will be easy if you just STUDY. I recommend her 100%! Take her!
                
                   Amazing Professor very nice! very clear in her lectures and fun too! attendance is not mandatory except for exam dates and labs which are extremely easy and fun. If you have problems with her exams she tries her best to help you out. one of the BEST professors i have ever had. any bad reviews are probably from angry students that failed her class
                
                   The best Political Scoence professor at TAMUCC! Those who have put negative comments about here obviously never went to class and thought they would have the easy way out! She's amazing! Always willing to help you and very caring! I recommend her 100%! The class is easy if you study the study guide that she gives you! Awesome professor!
                
                   She is such a nice professor very clear on her lectures and fun too! her attendance is only mandatory on exam dates or &quot;labs&quot; which are once a week and you do an activity just showing up and doing it gets you a high grade. She is also very helpful and understanding. Over all one of the BEST professors i have ever had!
                
                   Great professor. Started out hard, then became more engaging. Was very helpful in conference. Think some people expected an easy class.
                
                   Started out very hard. Was great in individual conference and engaging as semester went on. Really got me going on some issues. I think some students were expecting a &quot;walk.&quot;
                
                   One of the worst teachers I have had.  Is inconsistent and cannot be trusted.  Does not care about students.
                
                   Great professor! Clear power points, and tests are based off the power point. Gives good test reviews. Always willing to help. Works hard to make sure the class is understanding the information and willing to change things around to figure out what works best.
                
                   The absolute worst teacher I have ever had.  Most students are not even paying attention in class because she is so boring.  Do not trust this person.
                
                   Do not take her. She doesn't know what she is teaching half the time. Unfair and unreasonable on grading. Reviews do not reflect what is on her tests.
                
                   This teacher is very very hard and i have never had to study so much for a class and this is because i am a nursing major!!!! DO NOT TAKE HER!!! otherwise she is very nice and misleading
                
                   This class is super easy.
                
                   Okay teacher. Reviews are very misleading for her exams, and she is unclear on some issues when you ask her questions about the material. Otherwise she is very nice.
                
                   Followed her ppt slides but helped make things make sense and understand the point of the class. definitaly read the book and learn the vocab for test but overall she is a good teacher and doesnt make the class hard or to boring for a poli sci class.
                
                   I felt like I was in a high school class for the entire semester. I rarely attended about midway through the semester because her lectures are useless -- just read the textbook. She's more concerned about people texting than teaching; she reads straight off of her powerpoints and talks about irrelevant anecdotes useless to the lecture. don't bother
                
                   Highlight the vocab in the text book, they will be on the test. She does not take attendence, and lectures can be boring. But if you go to class you will most likely make a better grade. Nice lady though
                
                   She's pretty much the best instructor I had all semester. She made class very easy and discussions were always a blast.
                
                   Although she is very strict and attendance is mandatory, her Political Analysis class was fun and very interesting. After the first day of class I was worried this would be my toughest class. The material can be complicated and confusing, but Dr. Stewart walks you through each and every step and she is very approachable. Overall, good class.
                
                   she is very nice and does a great job explaining the course material so that every student can understand, there is alot of work required but its not that hard
                
                   Her lectures are hypnotic, she wastes most of the class either talking about completely unrelated issues or hunting down texters.  When she does actually talk about something useful, it is word for word from her online powerpoint.  Just go to class before the exams and study in groups and with your seminar instructor.
                
                   she changed her name from melissa neal!! she cant escape her past reviews. University needs new instructor, enough said.
                
                   Of all the years in college, this is the worst instructor I have ever had. There is no organization in lecture. Be prepared to teach yourself in this class, and grading is severely harsh.
                
                   Had her for a summer course. She is interesting and fun, and she made the 2 hours go by fast! Her reviews were helpful for the exams. Class was pretty easy.
                
                   Lots of online work. Do the assignments, learnsmart, and quizzes they determine your grade more than the test do. If you go to class it's going to help you, sometimes he'll take attendance other times not. Good teacher, just a lot of work. He assigns work to be due over the weekend, so be prepared to actually work.
                
                   READ THE BOOK! He is very liberal and isn't afraid to share his view. You don't necessarily have to go to class as long as you read the chapter and know the vocabulary.
                
                   The lectures had nothing to do with what we were actually learning. The only way I was able to pass the class was because he dropped the lowest test grade out of 5, and he gave large amounts of bonus questions on the tests. If you don't read and have a study group on your own it'll be hard to learn anything.
                
                   The lectures can be dull, but he takes attendance so don't skip. Before each test he gives a review through campus email (just email him if you don't get one) and as long as you do the review (which is mostly vocab) and skim the main chapter points, you'll do very well on the test. He also gives large amounts of bonus questions on each test.
                
                   Barely prepares for tests in class. If you don't read you will fail; however, there are always a lot of extra credit questions on each test. VERY LIBERAL. If you're looking at his test questions and there is an answer that might make Republicans look bad - that is the correct answer. 
                
                   Carhart is a typical pols professor. Very liberal but will never openly admit it. Nice person, LOVES POLITICS, lectures get long and boring but if you sit up front and participate in discussions its not too bad. Tests are fair and the extra credit is generous. Will take him again. (ask him about the barcode on the back of the stop sign)
                
                   II would suggest taking during summer sessions.  His smaller classes are way better than fall or spring, because you will not be stuck in an auditorium with 100+ students.   Taking his summer class is night and day compared the fallspring.  Much more enjoyable.  You can make an A!
                
                   He himself tends to assert his opinion quite a lot both in tests and in lectures. But, there are 5 exams and he drops the lowest exam grade & on each exam there are 10- 20 bonus questions .His lectures will not teach you the material you need to know for the test, but you don't need to buy the book as long as you use the books website & quizlet.
                
                   Very boring lectures.  He sits at the front of the class in his chair and lectures.  He does not used any PowerPoints, so you you better read the book.  His tests are a bit confusing although he does use a curve system.  He takes attendance so don't plan on skipping as it is part of your grade.
                
                   I actually had a lot of trouble understanding his very democratic view. His test were all very bias. If you study more than the day of you should pass. If you can take the test at another school, I would advise that. 
                
                   His lectures are very boring and he doesn't use powerpoints.  If you read the book and memorize vocabulary, you'll pass.
                
                   Bring your book to class! That is, honestly, the only way you'll learn anything. Lectures are more of a public forum for him to vent his grievances with the government and voice his conspiracy theories. 
                
                   Easy A. Just very, very, very boring.
                
                   He takes attendance and will curve averages accordingly, but his lectures have nothing to do with his tests. He mostly goes off on tangents about how stupid conservative republicans are, so I read my book in class. Tests are directly from the text so if you read you'll do fine.
                
                   Class is very fun and interactive. The tests are related to the book and current events only. Never lectures in class, just either talks about what HE wants to, or reads out of the book. He will try to make you look stupid when you ask questions. Honestly, I only failed due to not reading and doing poorly on the last exam.
                
                   I wasn't super excited about the class. Politics doesn't excite me the way it excites Carhart. He is energetic engaging, and super helpful. Plus, its the easiest class I've taken in College.
                
                   Carhart is VERY liberal. I fell asleep literally every day in his class and passed all of the classes. Just know to always choose the liberal answer. I did not like this class. It was a waste of time and very unproductive. Go to class everyday because he checks role.
                
                   Grades on attendance. Takes questions from the book- READ.
                
                   Read the book and use the study guide.
                
                   Super nice guy. Lectures go off-topic sometimes, but if you study from the book and the review you will do well. I don't have a problem with him.
                
                   What did I learn in this class&#63; Nothing. Got 2 take-home exams towards the end of semester, Final was based on the take-home. No complaints here.
                
                   Easy A if you put in about an hour a week. I was shocked to hear students were doing poorly in his class.   Attend lectures, take decent notes, do the 1 hw assignment a week, 3 tests, and 2 presentations throughout the semester, it sounds like a lot when its all next to each other but this was an easy A and I actually learned.   Take him!
                
                   Easy class. Only grades comes from exams and presentations. Exams consists of questions made from students which come form the assigned readings and presentations aren't difficult unless you don't like presenting in front of your class. Highly recommend him if you have to take both governments and want to not worry too much on them.
                
                   Good prof. Weekly assignments, but not hard. Tests aren't too bad, but require a bit of studying. test questions are almost all lecture so have to show up to get high grade.
                
                   Good class. Lets class make the studyguide with assigmnents. Knows his stuff but be hard to pass without coming
                
                   He doesn't care if you attend class, but all his exams are based of notes and homework.
                
                   Very understandable and likes to  keep your attention! She is very  pretty as well!
                
                   very nice, andmakes it interesting :)
                
                   so easy it's amazing
                
                   all about the multiple choice
                
                   One of best professors on campus
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Dr. Ellis is a sweet man with a great personality, but his lectures are pointless!  His tests have nothing to do with what he lectures on...he tends to sway off topic...
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Very easy class!!! Take him if you can, I recommend it.
                
                   Great teacher, lots of extra credit, worth taking
                
                   Great teacher, very helpful toward all his students. He also teaches SOCI 1201.  He gives lots of extra credit and is very understanding.
                
                   Awesome teacher! great sense of humor and is fair in class w/ lots of extra cedit. TAKE HIM you wont regret it
                
                   Dr. Ellis is one of the best Political Scientists I have ever had.  He is reasonable and very friendly.
                
                   Wonderful professor!  Worth taking for alot of classes!
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Best teacher i've had. Powerpoints are interesting and up to date, uses lots of funny photos and gets real into his lectures. Very fun class!
                
                   super easy and nice professor. he helps as much as he can, makes class really interesting. offers si sessions before test which help a lot you should be able to pass class with A
                
                   He is an amazing teacher! I highly recommend this professor to anyone! Especially if you don't like to have to read a textbook all the time because there isn't one required for the class! If you literally just sit there in class and pay attention to his lecture just a little bit and the class should come pretty easy to you! Really enjoyed the class
                
                   He's a genuinely nice guy. He is a major dork and you can't help but laugh at him sometimes. It takes a while to get used to his method of teaching, but once you do the class is easy. Not many notes are required if you just listen and pay attention. Tests are fairly easy. Ask questions and you're good!
                
                   She is a good teacher but she gives work but is not alot. You have to make sure you show up and always do the assigned reading becasue she will quiz you over them. Learn to listen to other opinions even if you dont agree.
                
                    I learned many different things about political science specifically in Texas, as well as the importance of social movements. Dr. Mascagni is very passionate about her teaching; she makes students participate and be engaged during class. Therefore, her what she teaches, actually sticks, and will help positively to anyone in their future education.
                
                   Really liked Prof Mascagni but her class is a challenge. She gets you to think outside the box and isn't afraid to tackle controversial issues. Would recommend. 
                
                   Professor Mascagni is beyond amazing.   I entered this course not wanting anything to do with politics because I thought it was to complicated to understand.  Professor Mascagni does everything possible to help you understand what is going on and what is important for you to know.  Take her course and believe me she won't let you down.  
                
                   Prof Mascagni is very passionate about her classes and the topics she lists in her syllabus. There is a lot of required reading and class participation but on interesting subjects based on feminist teachings.  Her standards are high, but she makes herself available for any  extra help. You will leave class feeling inspired!
                
                   Great professor. Would take her again. She's a fun spirit.
                
                   She is a great teacher. she is passionate  about what she teaches while motivating her students to get involved 
                
                   Good Overall, Just review study materials over the test and you'll be fine.
                
                   If you like a challenge&someone who is going to push you to learn take Prof Mascagni. I've never been good in POLS/can honestly say that I know much more than what I did before. She likes students to participate in class&ask ques. Class is manageable&not at all intimidating ONLY IF you keep up w/the work&attend office hrs. I'll be taking her again.
                
                   Murphey was a nice surprise. I hate politics but he made it interesting. He sort of looked like Jack from Titanic. He was nice and there was something nice about his eyes. He made sure that we understood government instead of just the book which made tests easier. Funny thing was that I had him for a CS class just a year before. I got an A. 
                
                   Awesome dude. Made it fun to learn.
                
                   This prof was great! I hate politics and government, but he made it interesting! He made the class so interesting that the tests were easy, even though they would have been difficult without his lessons! If he is teaching, you should take him. You will not sleep through this class.
                
                   Prof. Murphy was the substitute of the substitute. I had Phaup first, but he had to take a leave of absence. Then we had Ellis. He was great, but he had Prof. Murphy teach us when he couldn't be there which was often. He was great! He actually discussed information for the test but also brought up current events. I actually learned something in cla
                
                   Lecutres the whole class time. Extra credit available, test are easy.
                
                   this guy is extremely boring. he just lectures throughout the whole class and does not go over anything useful for the quizzes. his quizzes r prety easy though, but goin to his class helps out at the end for extra credit. overall, boring ass teacher but easy.
                
                   He talks the whle time but the quizzes are easy and no test in his class
                
                   His tests are easy, all you have to do is read the txt and be able to answer T/F.  If you're interested in government (as you shld be, at least a little) his class is informational and enjoyable.  If you're paying attention you may even catch his quiet political humor.  If you take him, read, and do well on the easy tests, you will get an A.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Great class ... liked his grading system
                
                   Hey, this guy is really great. He may not be easy, but you really do learn alot. He is always willing to help out!  I suggest you take STATS before Research & Analysis though. :)
                
                   not clear at all
                
                   You take this class so that you can feel lost. The best you can hope for is a 'C'.
                
                   alot of people dropped his class.  hard class -- bad grading scale.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Research & Analysis:  This is a very difficult class.  Dr. Phaup does a nice job of teaching, but there is too much work for students if they are also taking other classes.  If you have to take the class, just make sure that you don't take anything else.
                
                   Great professor! Dr. Suthammanont expects that everybody do their work and participate in class discussions.  Dr. S explains everything with a tremendous abount of knowledge behind her explanations.  She's also quite humorous.  I do recommend!
                
                   An amazing teacher that I looked up too all 2 years of college take her as a pols major or minor
                
                   One of the few professors out there who actually treat their students like adults instead of kindergartners. She really knows her stuff.  All of her classes are the same, 3 tests, a final, and a 10 page paper.
                
                   Great teacher. A bit too liberal.  Never a dull class.
                
                   She is so easy and hot.
                
                   He is a great guy and hopefully teaching Tx Govt. in the spring so I can take him again. He will work with you just talk to him. He gave us a 50 t/f test one time and we all bombed! He found out real quick taht that was not a good idea!!! I love you Dudik!!!
                
                   I just said he's hot becuase he is like so masculine the way he talks! But he always tells stories and that helps make government more real. I would tell anybody to take him if you want to learn and enjoy it- but you HAVE to work.
                
                   Dr. Dixon expects you to read a lot before class used for class discussion  & lectures. Full respect of the students that are willing to participate with points given towards grade for discussions. He is respected by my self and other students.  I have taken most all political science classes with him. Intellectually Brilliant Instructor & Person
                
                   He expects you to know the subject and doesnt water anything down. However if you have question is will to help
                
                   You will work for your degree in his class.  I took him for most classes to get my Masters and it was rough.  He was very clear and very helpful.  Extremely smart man.  His intelligence forces his students to think critically.  He is an asset to TAMU-CT and I am glad that I had the honor to learn from him.
                
                   Burdensome reading, confusing syllabus, and absolutely no clarity on what he expects. He speaks at a highly clinical level-above the heads of most undergrads. Tests consist of 2 essay questions which are graded very subjectively.
                
                   Prepare to work hard. This will be not be an easy A. Dr. Dixon will work with you if you're consistent in turning in your work completed and on time and if you show up for class. Sometimes it will be confusing, but as long as you honestly do your very best, you will succeed in his classes. If you have a question, ask; He is a nice guy, one-on-one.
                
                   College is not supposed to be easy but if you work hard, study consistently and follow directions to the letter you will be successful in Dr Dixon' class. He displays little if any political bias and grades on the merit/support of your paper vise personal beliefs. He will play devils advocate but not out of spite. You will learn a ton from him!
                
                   
                
                   His nickname is "Dr. Dread" for a reason - the ones that can't cut it dread taking him. Only take his courses if you are ready to be an adult, take responsibility, and learn.  Best Course I ever had  - Best Professor I ever had - The ONLY reason I'm graduating from UT Law at the top of my class.
                
                   This guy separates the cellar dwellers from the greatness.  He is honest, genuine, and entertaining.  I have taken classes and did not want them to end.  He is not easy, but the road to greatness passes through this instructors classes.   
                
                   Absolutely awful and he has a reputation on campus for being awful. Very unprofessional. He should want to elevate himself above gutter talk. His class is easy to get a decent grade in as long as you jump through his hoops and play his silly games. I will try to avoid him at all cost in the future and would recommend everyone else do the same!!!!!!
                
                   You'll hate his class while you're in it, but later you'll thank him for being so tough. One of my favorites of my college career.
                
                   Had him for Campaigns and Elections at UTD. One of the best Professors ever. Don't let the first day scare you. You will learn from him.
                
                   Tough but fair.  Do the work and you shall be rewarded.  Read the syllabus.  There's extra credit, too.
                
                   Very awesome professor. He will work with you as long as you show up and do the work. So do the work, show up and dont stress. Great guy. Thanks
                
                   Good teacher!  I just finished 2 of his classes, one online and one in person, and I recommend him.  He tries to get you thinking without pushing his personal views.  I learned a lot and he gave me some great comments on my essay that I will use.
                
                   I had his U.S. political thought class last year and loved it.  He isn?t afraid to talk about controversial topics and I like how he presented stories and asked us what we thought.
                
                   I like the fact that he has a lot of things for us to do.  Non-graded assessments, quizzes, study guides, great discussions.  The questions he asks us are really good since they don?t have ?yes? or ?no? answers and generate a variety of comments.  He was very nice and thoughtful when I went and talked with him.  He?s really into this stuff!
                
                   I just took his web class.  It was well organized and I now understand what's going on here in with the two cities.  If you can get into one of his web classes, take it!!
                
                   I liked that he's actually interested in the subject matter, it made learning about it a lot more fun.  He also gave me great feedback on my essay, more than I've gotten from other professors.  He?s also easy to talk to.
                
                   I have learned so much in this class!  I appreciate Dr. Bugh's assistance with the whole process and his caring attitude towards students.  The summary assignment has helped me understand public law on different levels.
                
                   Dr. Bugh is an awesome teacher. He is very helpful and treats students with respect.
                
                   I was hesitant to sign up for a Political Science class, but Dr. Bugh has made it really interesting and accessible.  He made it clear right from the start what the course expected from me and has always been available and willing to help me out.  His lessons are extremely clear and informative and, importantly, interesting!
                
                   From the start, it is obvious that this professor knows what he's doing - very organized, clear, helpful, and thought provoking.  Wish I would have taken him earlier!
                
                   Bugh is an amazing professor! He is clear with his expectations, organized, interesting, and always willing to help. His assignments & tests are straight forward and relate to class material. He is great at fostering class discussion and values every comment made by students.
                
                   My favorite teacher thus far. Go to class, he lectures, you take notes, you pass. Everything he lectures is on the test. Nothing tricky. Only 4 tests and tells you about extra credit the first week of class. Isn't due until last class day. WIsh I could take him again.
                
                   He is a super nice and easy professor but you won't pass his class if you don't put any effort. You have to do the review and study for the test but he is super helpful and overall I would recommend him and god! He is hot for is age!
                
                   He is a very easy teacher as long as you study the notes.  I made an A on every test and I never once opened the book!
                
                   He is great. Super clear. He gives you reviews about what is on the test. Just look up all that stuff in the book if not in the notes. Mostly everything is in the notes. His tests are too the point. Make sure to go to class all the time, he does take attendance.
                
                   I did not learn very much in my Government class in high school, but Mr. Price explains it in a way that I can understand. If you pay attention in class and read the book, you will do good in this class!
                
                   Dr. Price is an excellent prof! I didn't learn much about government in high school, but he explains it in a way that makes sense.  He lectures every day and starts off the class discussion with "What's going on in the world today?" I love his class! It keeps you involved and makes you learn, but it's pretty easy overall.
                
                   hes really easy and give u a week off for thanksgiving break , and u actually learn in the class. he only teaches pol 2301 so i recommend him for that class
                
                   Great professor! Lectures aren't long and boring, but keep up with the reading. He offers review time before the test and it helps a lot!! Also, he gives reviews and goes over them in class together! Does involve each student in class discussions about &quot;whats going on in the world&quot;. -- He is great!!
                
                   Good professor very laid back enviroment, tests are easy if you take class notes and go over the study guide. Frequently cancels Friday classes so expect to have some time off.
                
                   Excellent !
                
                   Very interesting individual, keeps everyone participating in the class at all times, putting people on the spot, not just once but daily. Very fun, enjoyed it very much. Tests were a breeze, study guides were given out, multiple choice.
                
                   Super cool professor! He's very intelligent and clear about what he discusses.  The course is a little difficult but he makes it seem easy with the way he teaches.  Just go to class and speak up and there is no reason for less than a high B.
                
                   He is a great professor!  I really enjoyed his class and discussions!  He's very intelligent and obviously enjoys political science.  Definetely a professor worth taking!  I would take a class with him anyday.
                
                   He's a HOTTIE!  I'll give him that.  His class is lots of reading though.  I got a C b/c I didn't care to follow up on reading.
                
                   He is great!! Tests come directly from notes!! Very interesting and knowledgeable!!
                
                   What an intelligent HOTTIE! I AM HAVING SO MUCH FUN! I feel guilty for enjoying the class so much. :P
                
                   Great professor! I wish that I would have taken his classes earlier! Great discussions...and not overwhelmed by busy work.  Highly Recommended!
                
                   Great prof! Really knows his stuff. Hot guy too. And girls, he's SINGLE! :)
                
                   Hot and single guy!  Worth taking again!
                
                   Took her for summer school, very sweet lady.  Lectures aren't too interesting but she throws stories in to keep you awake.  She gives a big curve on tests and we had a few projects to bump up our grade.
                
                   she  knows her stuff. but the lectures are pretty boring if you are not involved.  She doesnt go over whats on the exams so having the book is good to have to go over the chapters
                
                   She is a really good teacher. She knows her stuff. The tests are hard but as said before she grades on a major curve. I think i did well, for not even opening the book.
                
                   long boring lectures
                
                   Took her for American Jud Process, a Senior class. She is nice & approachable. For our class we did a lot of essay & case study work on court case decisions. Not hard but some original thought & work is the point of her material. Only negative is her lectures can be long and boring. We had to tell her when class time was up otherwise she won't stop
                
                   Nice but lectures not too interesting but easy & major curves on tests
                
                   watch you attendance she will drop if you have to many absences excussed and unexcussed combined
                
                   Excellent professor.  She knows what she is talking about and makes class fun, especially with her class discussions.  I would definitely take more classes with this professor.
                
                   Very intelligent woman, knowledgeable on her subjects
                
                   his son is hot too!
                
                   Extremely boring class! Great Guy, offers extra credit!
                
                   Very easy class, boring....but easy. His previous tests are downloadable from the library and most of his questions come from there.
                
                   very boring class. zzzzzzzzz.
                
                   He is a very nice guy, but there is a lot of reading.
                
                   Good professor and an all-around nice guy
                
                   Great guy. His old test are in the libarary. He has great discussions and is a very nice guy. He likes to talk about whats going on in the world.
                
                   Prof. Lipscomb is the best professor in this university.  He is very polite, and he has an awesome attitude toward students.
                
                   Take this guy for both classes!  He is fun -- and his tests are in the library!
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   AWESOME PROF!
                
                   long dull lectures. constant quizzes
                
                   His lectures are pointless. He only shows an outline of the notes and rambles on about things that have nothing to do with it which requires you to go through the book to fill in blanks. Quizzes are based of out book so reading is mandatory. Gives a lot of extra credit. Class is easy if you read and do extra credit. I still would not recommend.
                
                   He's knowledgeable but displays liberal bias. Midterm and final have a review that is allowed to be used during test. Lecture every time is too quiet and boring. Gives extra credit.
                
                   Hartwig is extremely old fashion and because of that most of your work will be based on the book. Everyone dreaded attending his class. I can honestly say the only plus side to taking this course with him was all the extra credit he gave. Do not be fooled... He gives so much extra credit because his class is not very helpful.
                
                   Hartwig is a nice guy in general and out of the classroom...but I HATED his Political Science 2301 class. The notes he shows you over a projector aren't even notes- they are just an outline. Not everybody has time to go back into the book and fill in all of the missing notes you need. His quizzes are pointless and very frequent Just study for tests
                
                   Liberal biased professor who made us watch a documentary bashing fox news. I took his TR classes so the longer duration required a big cup of coffee to stay awake, as he may seem boring to many.  He devoutly beleives the threat of global warming because he is a politician not a geologist.  He has alot of interesting slides and is multilingual.
                
                   Had him for Technology & Society. He took a very liberal & bias take on POLS. Spends time bashing Bush & praising Obama. Talked about environmental causes a lot, which had me wondering what that had to do with the course. He had us watch Al Gore's An Inconvenient Truth & other anti Bush videos. Kind man but his essay grading system is tough
                
                   This professor was okay but quite bias overall. He based several things on his opinion/preference rather than just telling the facts in the case of Politics. Otherwise, I had some trouble with him understanding me if I had a question to ask. Tests aren't hard if you study the notes. Pop quizzes are okay but could indicate quiz dates on syllabus.
                
                   Good professor, I would recommend him.
                
                   This is a class I HAD to take for graduation, and although Dr. Hartwig does talk in a soft voice, if you are attentive and follow the syllabus you will do good.  I recommend reading the text and then doing the online exercises they really help.  I really liked this class but would opt to never take a POLS class again!!!!
                
                   He is an overall well teacher.  Again he could spice up his lec. and talk a little bit louder.  Recommend sitting near the front to stay attentive and awake.  Use the book and other resources that are in the libary so know were that is.
                
                   Nothing but class lectures.  Very boring, but not too hard.  He teaches alright.  For most people it requires out of class participation to get a decent grade (he lets you attend 1 hour political debates for extra credit)
                
                   Good man. He just needs more umph to spice up his lectures other wise it gets a little boring. Even if boring, he's good. I enjoy that he knows Spanish. Bright professor and caring too.
                
                   Dr. Hartwig is a very knowledgable professor -- with great communication skills. His speciality is Latin American Politics, but he taught Tech & Changing Society well. Very recommendable!
                
                   I took Fletcher for Tx Politics and he was a great teacher. Wasn't boring, made class fun, and easy to remember. Real easy to talk to and understanding.  Would get the class very involved and the reviews given would make the test simple. Test were not hard if you go to class. Would strongly recommend this professor.
                
                   Dr. Goswami is an amazing professor. I'm a political science major and on the first day of class he asked to see me to talk about my plans. I enjoy his class a lot and I love the lectures. He is extremely helpful to anybody that asks. Tests are tough so make sure you study and are prepared.
                
                   Tough class, exams consist of questions  he never even addressed. 
                
                   No group work or quiz nonsense. He is a lecture driven professor. Tests are multiple choice & essay, but grades essay section a little hard.  Seems like it's difficult to get an A in his course. Always willing to help students who need it. Nice man. I took him for an advanced course & he gave us no study guide, he may do it for lower level courses.
                
                   no-nonsense, extremely knowledgeable, will help you if you need assistance understanding anything.
                
                   Rude Professor. Cuts off students while they are talking and blows them off. Also picks favorites. Has an &quot;all professors but me suck&quot; attitude. Not recommended.
                
                   Very good instructor. Fun and easy to get along with. I had doubts and thats cause i'm a POLS major. The whole thing about him picking fav's and such is B.S. Just show up, do your work with some effort. I got a B even though i didn't put the effort and i don't believe i still deserve it.  Warning though, don't take him for granted
                
                   Very difficult professor rips you on essays.  However his own countrymen get B's on the essays and cant write english.
                
                   Do not miss his class. Attendance is important to him. If you skip class a lot he'll let you know the next time your in class. He was a fun professor though. He made Texas Government more enjoyable.
                
                   I think Professor Goswami is an amazing professor, he makes the class interesting and gives lots of examples to help us understand. I also think he really loves what he does..
                
                   he is funny and smart
                
                   this guy has an huge ego. he is stuck on his own political philosophy, and everyone else is &quot;wrong.&quot; tell him what he wants to hear, and you'll do well. there are alot of mistakes in the multiple choice, like questions not covered in material. and don't forget to argue well in the essays. if he doesnt like you, you will see it in your essay grades.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Fantastic professor but not easy.  Reviews before tests and also encourages students to review answers later.  Great lectures, lots of examples.  Very funny.  Many polisci majors want him to be their advisor. If you like dark and foreign, he's hot.
                
                   Very hard but excellent professor. Very fair. Extremely helpful, makes political science real and relevant. Good physique. I can imagine having a &quot;good&quot; time with him!
                
                   THIS PROFESSOR IS A BAD TEACHER. HIS LECTURES ARE GOOD, BUT HIS TESTS ARE SOMETIMES RECYCLED, AND THEY COVER MATERIAL THAT HE HAS NOT COVERED IN CLASS. HE IS VERY PICKY ON HIS GRADES TOO, GIVING HIS FAVORITES BETTER GRADES WHEN THEY DONT DESERVE IT. WORSE OF ALL, HE HAS A VERY POMPOUS ATTITUDE.
                
                   This guy is not a good professor. He is much too subjective in his grading. If he likes you, he will give you good grades.  If he doesn't, beware! Avoid his classes and take ANYONE else!
                
                   Intresting class but his test do not make any sense. No extra credit is even offred. His lectures consist os alot of stories.
                
                   Dr. Goswami is a great lecturer, but he is partial with his grading. If he expects alot from you, he will grade you harshly. If he doesn't, he is an easy grader. Relax in his class, but study hard for his tests. They are killers!
                
                   good lectures. rough tests. difficult to make a good grade. he grades the essays with alot of scrutiny. overall, it was difficult.
                
                   Good prof.  The essay section of each test is quite difficult, but I learned alot in the class.
                
                   Great Professor over all LOTS of extra credit. Read before class and quizzes should be simple. Just do they  study guide before and you will know most answers on quizes
                
                   Make sure you read the chapter prior to going to class because he gives quizzes on the chapter assigned before he lectures. He does not give out homework but reading is a must.
                
                   Quiz BEFORE every chapter so book is a must have! Gives study guides that you will have to read over each topic he has so we could fully understand,so reading is must in this class in order to pass.
                
                   quiz before every chapter of the book you must read
                
                   I like the way she teaches! Gives many opportunities to do extra credit. Helps students out and explains very well. Class is always fun and I am never bored. If you are lazy however this class is not for you! She has certain standards and requires 100% commitment.
                
                   Awesome professor, plenty of people complain about her because her class is harder than the expected. Well welcome to college. Lessons are always fun and she gives a lot of opportunities for extra credit!
                
                   I think it is funny that many people are complaining about her for being to hard. Yes her exams and quizzes are not easy but if you study and do all the extra credit you can get an A even if you do not care much about Texas Govt. Her class is always fun and never gets boring. She really cares about being a good teacher and always offers help.
                
                   She's hard but the  lectures are intersting and she  gives extra credit.
                
                   She's hard but the  lectures are intersting and she  gives extra credit.
                
                   Great teacher, plenty of people complain about her because she is stern. Well, its college. If you don't do your work and only put in a minimal amount of effort then what can you expect&#63; One of the few teachers that doesn't cave in to students sob stories.
                
                   This class was pretty difficult. When a professor hands out a syllabus I would assume that they would follow it. The lectures don't cover any material that is found on the tests, and neither does the book. Good luck :)
                
                   Overall decent teacher.  I pulled a C just by coming to class and participating every day and trying hard on the quizzes and tests.  I did not read, take notes or study whatsoever as I was not motivated due to her feminist/liberal bias, and mainly my views on institutionalized political activists in colleges. On the bright side class wasn't boring.
                
                   Ms. Cardona, is a decent teacher.  She can be somewhat unorganized, and here quizzes don't come from the lecture.  On the syllabus, it states that if you don't miss any class dates you will get 25 points added to any test. She tends to bring some of her personal problems to class. If she's going to miss class, she should make it up to her students.
                
                   She was pretty cool, and fair. It was hard for my B, but if you rea, you can make an A
                
                   Dr. Carranza is hard to understand and follow. He often goes past his time limit and will make you late for your next class. His lectures are long, boring and all over the place making you confused all the time. Would not recommend but he sometimes makes jokes which is cool.
                
                   Dr. Carranza is a great professor he is always trying to help you pass. But you must go to class because group work is key to passing the class. Also he has knowledge about Latin america and has an interesting idea about politics overall. 
                
                   The guy is good but class participation is a must with him, group work every day and you must read the book in order to pass the class. his course is repetitive so if you know someone who took him in the past then try to get the past test from them because he doesnt change much on them. Overall a cool guy.
                
                   Group work everyday, reports should contain a lot of quotes. A lot of reading, but oh well college demands it. Extra credit points if you simply answer questions. Tells you what chapters to study for tests. Over all B to A grade can be achieved.
                
                   This class has been very difficult for many reasons. He is difficult to understand, class is super fast paced, his lectures are very unorganized and unclear, he expects a lot,there is group work EVERY class.  I would not recommend him to someone who is not very versed in political science. I am hoping to get an A, but doubtful.
                
                   Great professor, easy and not strict. Just show up, participate in discussions and really read everything he gives you. If you do that your set for a high B or an A.
                
                   Easy class.... alot of easy group work. Easy A
                
                   difficult course as I am not a poli sci major and his accent is sometimes hard to follow. However when I had trouble in the course he gave extra credit and dropped one of my poor grades. He is very flexible but you have to read the text and show up. I ended up with an a but it was a difficult a to get.
                
                   Took him for International Relations and International Law. He can get picky on things and his views verge on Liberal when discussing policy matters. His exams are tough & the assigned readings are long. His essay assignments can be demanding and long as well. You've been warned.
                
                   I love that he gives curves in his class.  I never really understood his questions for the test though.  there is group work all the time in class.
                
                   Terrific teacher! Like having a fun, crazy uncle teach your class
                
                   He speaks fast and expects alot. Beware, not for the faint of heart.
                
                   Very easy class, Carranza is like the Grandpa of Poli Sci, I recommend him to everyone. He has an accent since he's from Argentina, but you get used to it.
                
                   Does not make any sense, his lecture needs to be a little bit more organized. Group war is great!!!Gives alot of extra points foe answering questions in class. That is a plus. Makes a diffrence if you pass or fail.
                
                   Very sweet man. He is hard to understand but his curves are great!
                
                   dr. carranza is not easy. i don't know if he or the other professors could pass his tests. he is not a good lecturer. his notes are complicated, and do not have a final point. the class seems very scatter-brained. without his curves, no one would ever earn an 'a.' take him with warning.
                
                   Can this man speak english&#63; His tests are really difficult, and I don't think that I learned anything last year. What a waste. It is NOT easy to earn an A! I worked my tail off, and hardly made a B.
                
                   Mr. Easy.  If you don't make an a in this course, you are not supposed to be in college.
                
                   definately a class you want to take especially for his grade curves!  if you are failing, go to him...writing a paper will save your life
                
                   Waddell is beyond boring. His voice drones on and you can't help but NOT pay attention in that class. He has a sign up sheet that gets passed around, so attendance is mandatory. But, I sign in and leave. Tests are stupid, you get to print notes and use them. So much extra credit that can make a D go to an A easily. So unbelievably easy.
                
                   Super easy A. Everything is open note, you can print his lectures 5 minutes before the test and still make an A. HILARIOUS -- always telling dirty jokes and funny relevant stories...makes the class not suck for science majors. Really flexible, understanding, and helpful. Awesome prof!
                
                   loved this class!  he is so helpful.  just listen and you will learn.
                
                   Professor Waddell is amazing. He teaches with real experiences and he makes a very boring subject as interesting as he possible can. His jokes are awesome and he hands out bonus points at every chance. You get 5 pts on your final avg for missing less than 3 days. His tests are easy if you truly study the pretests. Go to class, and you'll pass.
                
                   Overall, the class is a very easy class. He gets off topic in his lectures in an attempt to keep a boring subject interesting. He is very experienced and knows what he's talking about. He gives TONS of extra credit opportunity, and bonuses for attendance. When you study - don't go too indepth, he just asks for the basics.
                
                   This class was infuriating; complete waste of time and money. An insult to any half-way intelligent student who lands in the audience. Didn't open the book ($100-thanks Waddell), got an A. Stupid, geriatric jokes... on repeat. Sweet Irony: Class focus is anatomy of the same ineffective state government which made this class required for graduation!
                
                   Go to class and you will pass. Lots of extra credit opportunities.
                
                   It is a pretty easy class the prof. is funny. make sure you go to class he passes around an attendance sheet and you get credit for being there. his test are normally from his lecture more than the book so listen in class
                
                   Pretty easy class usually off topic though!and he knows his jokes are bad and tells them anyway. You have to go to lecture because believe it or not there is actual information in them it is just hard to notice and you won't know till after the first test that there was anything in his rambling. may cover one slide in class. Some jokes inapropriate
                
                   Go to class,  pay attention and you will do well
                
                   Waddell uses easy-to-follow powerpoints to assist him in his lectures.  He tends to go off on tangents and make lots of jokes during his lectures, but I can't deny it makes the class more interesting and enjoyable.
                
                   the man tries harder than you. lots of extra credit. funny in a weird way.
                
                   An easy teacher the test were a bit specific and nitpicky but he had tons of opportuinites for extra credit if you needed it. Also very easy to talk to and get help from. Hes jokes were kind of stupid and he rambled on about random stuff a little to much but hey it was all stuff you dont have to rember for the test.
                
                   YOU WILL HAVE TO WORK FOR YOUR GRADE, BUT YOU GET MANY OPPORTUNITIES TO DO WELL. LOVES HIS CLASS AND LOVES TO HELP. CAN'T GO WRONG WITH THIS ONE!
                
                   this was a wierd wierd man
                
                   i was bored, but i guess he did the best he could
                
                   No Comments
                
                   great teacher and really gets the kids involved with the lessons. His tests were easy. I didn't even crack my book. Nice guy too. Great Prof.
                
                   Thought the class was well worth it and fairly simple. Lots of good stories to tell.
                
                   only interesting on the first day of class. i sat in the back of the room and brought a book to read the rest of the semester. not being a native texan, i had to teach myself state govt from the book. go to class!!! he counts attendance as a grade.
                
                   One of my favorite professors.  Expect to give at least 2 powerpoint presentations in his upper level courses and also at least one large paper/project due at the end as a final.  A lot of class discussion.  Midterm was 10 essays but gave information in class to study on for it.  Show up to class and pay attention and you will do fine.
                
                   As a person he's pretty cool. But his lectures aren't too helpful, his tests is what makes it hard. The tests is over the book, lectures, and powerpoints. So you have to attend class.  You can expect the specific stuff from the book rather than the overall concept on tests. Answers for a question on the test are very similar so they can be tricky.
                
                   He's a pretty cool dude and his lectures are not too bad. But WARNING his tests is what makes his class so hard. When he says the test is over the book and lectures, he is not lying. You can expect the specific stuff from the book rather than the overall concept on tests. But the class isn't bad if you're good at retaining information from the book
                
                   Nice lady; offers quite a bit of &quot;extra credit&quot; opportunities; a little unorganized; easy to talk to; exams are like 2-3 questions! and she gives/covers the material on them before the exam is given; is a lawyer and married to a lawyer; also a democrat...
                
                   Take notes and go to class because participation matters to an extent- missing some classes is OK if need be.  He gets off topic easy but interesting discussions.  For upper level classes - everything comes due at the end of the semester and expect a 15 page paper due as well, but he will provide feedback through the semester.  Easy on the eyes.
                
                   good overall
                
                   The tests don't match the lectures. It's as simple as that. 
                
                   super easy. barely went to class and got an a
                
                   His lectures are really boring and he doesn't talk about the powerpoints that he presents. He gives reviews a week before the test and a really good review the class before the test. He gave us an opportunity for an extra credit essay for every test which really helped. I ended up skipping class every day except for review days. 
                
                   Took a topic that could easily be boring and made it interesting.  With a class of about 250 students in a lecture hall interaction was minimal, but his teaching style and personality made the class worthwhile. I can only imagine that this course would be even better in a small mini-mester setting.
                
                   I would not take this class. Professor is boring he is there in his office hours if you need him, but not helpful. This is NOT an easy A class for slackers and I agree ppl walked out of his class all semester which was really frustrating while trying to learn
                
                   I think Ozymy is a good professor. You have to read the book and take notes to do well in class. Pretty interesting lectures, although I don't really like government. I got a B in the class.
                
                   I would not recommend this professor if you want to slack off or if you do not have time to go to his office hours. Of course this is college&you have to put in work, but the test do not match what he talks about in class. He is approachable I have been to his office hours he is also boring ppl walk out.
                
                   I would not recommend this professor it is sad to say once I saw all the awesome reviews about this professor.He is sweet and funny, but he needs to clarify things. I am at a C in the class.I have never missed a day of class&I go to office hours. He gets off topic and people tend to walk out of class while he is lecturing.
                
                   Great teacher, the class is very straight forward. Attendance is recommended because the test covers lectures. If you do the online assignments and end lectures you should have no problem passing the tests.
                
                   He's a cool guy. The lectures are fairly interesting, and you have to listen to him. The exams were all 50% lecture and 50% book. He gives a review sheet before the test and if you review all of the material in the book you'll do fine.
                
                   State and Local, taken during Maymester. Very easy class, 1 final, multiple paper, 2 field trips, and 1 presentation. Class was easy, must show up for graded attendance. Study notes and read chp for final, field trip 20% of grade. Made a high A, EASY EASY EASY!! he is very helpful
                
                   Good class. Ozymy is really helpful and fun. Loved the prison trip!
                
                   If you get less than an A in this class, there is something wrong with you. This guys is the easiest. He is also super great. Never a boring time with him.
                
                   Dr. Ozymy was an awesome professor. just make sure to take notes and attend class, he gives you everything you need for the exams.
                
                   Funny in a weird way, you will certainly not be falling asleep. He knows how to use PowerPoint, Videos and YouTube to keep your attention. Strange sense of humor! Would take again.
                
                   took him for the second political science and he was SO easy! take powerpoint notes, and he gives a review of the exam the class before you take it. study the exam and you will do fine! i got a high A with a breeze. recommend him for sure!
                
                   Had him for both State and Local, and US, he did a good job, just take notes and glance tru book.  Shows interesting videos.  And if you ever get to go on a field trip, it's a must. Just stay off the J-ward!
                
                   DO NOT TAKE THIS TEACHER! He is a absolutely horrible speaker and spends the entire period basically talking to himself. It is ridiculous how unorganized he is and completely useless as an overall instructor.  He is completely unprofessional and said that he would add me into a class that was full and then denyed the request!!!
                
                   I love politics, and I love learning but this instructor loves to discourage students with harsh and ridiculous grading. Pure example of bad education, and why the US if falling behind in motivated students.
                
                   She will go down as one of the worst professors I have ever had. Her lectures are terrible, she makes you learn everything by yourself, and she gives 15+ page assinments with little direction.She now has the last name Stewart. But if you look at the reviews under both names, she's terrible either way!
                
                   She was an OK professor. Attending class didn't really help much, and it was incredibly boring, but you had to go because sometimes she gave in class assignments that were worth ~20% of your overall grade. I would take her again if I had to because it was a fairly easy A, but it was definitely not an enjoyable class.
                
                   I have had her for two semesters. This is college people, studying and real work are required to pass any univeristy level course. Her papers and tests are intense, but not impossible. i have learned a lot, and my ability to write papers has improved. Thanx Dr. Neal! keep it up
                
                   Avoid this professor if you can. She is not very good at teaching and does not prepare students for test. Stay away if you are able. If you have to take her. Make sure to attend class but disregard most of her lecture. She uses the book for test but acts like her lectures are more important that they are. I love politics but hated this class.
                
                   Worst teacher of my college career. Has a chip on her shoulder, and wont shut up about her home state FL. Attendance is mandatory lectures do not cover test material. Exspect constant outburt and distractions durning class. Has her aids walk around class and police everyone. Needs her degree revoked.
                
                   Horrible, I can't believe how HORRIBLE this class was as well as the teacher.  Advice don't take him if you want a good grade in POLS.
                
                   WORST TEACHER EVER!! it's impossible to pass his tests, he doesn't give out a review, he made us do this dumb thing online(waste of time) didn't learn anything,the notes we take in class are not on the test, he's boring and confused all the time (makes you fall asleep) not funny, not a good teacher period!
                
                   SO BORING!!!!!!!
                
                   Horrible, Horrible, and oh, Horrible! Never got to a point at all, never made sense, and and never made anything interesting
                
                   I think his choice of reading material was appropriate for this class. He does have a lot of essays to be written but it encourages class participation and it really helps to understand the material for the test. I think he has done a good job. For the first time in my three years at college, I am excited for class disscussion. I plan on an A!
                
                   This is the class I've skipped out on the most in my college life!!!  I figured if I wanted to be borded to sleep I could do it in my own bed!!! Don't choose him he never stays on topic and test are confussing as HE*L. If you take him goodluck!!!
                
                   Napp is in the runnning for the worst professor I have ever had. His choice of text is poor.  His contribution to my education is minimal.
                
                   he is one of the worst professors i have ever had - he was a rude know-it-all and VERY unhelpful. He has NO business teaching!
                
                   Has trouble making his point.  Rights test questions that are confusing and not covered in lectures.
                
                   You must read the text for the tests! he gives no reviews. very boring and monotone. he doesnt explain things very well.
                
                   Be aware of this professor she is not approachable and I find her very rude.  Her teaching style will bore you to no ends!!!
                
                   She's a horrible professor. She holds grudges, isn't easy to talk to at all, and will give you an attitude for asking any questions by email. I would not recommend her to anyone.
                
                   I t was a really easy class. She gives points for showing up to class technically extra crdeit. Quizzes are pretty easy if you read and understand the chapter. Exams super easy, easier then quizzes. I am taking her again for 2305:)
                
                   I was excited to take this class until I realized how awful of a lecture it was.  Very strict on grading. Expect to make a 50 on something you work hard for. Also, make sure to check your blackboard before going to class every time, or you will show up to class when it is canceled since only a 10 hour notice is given.
                
                   honestly Im the only one who didn't drop out of my friends its a hard class.
                
                   This class was a horror. She can not teach to save her life, but she does give out extra-credit that is worth nothing. I leant my lesson.
                
                   I enjoyed Professor Nelson so much that I signed up to take POLS 2306 with her as well.  She was always willing to stay behind for any questions.  Her exams were mostly based on lecture material, which she posts online, while there were a few easy assignments online you use the textbook for.  Pretty straight forward class, just attend for lectures!
                
                   I liked professor Nelson. Really willing to help, and give class extra credit. Yet, there's ALOT of reading to do for the tests, and the tests to be honest are kinda difficult. 
                
                   YOU MUST BE THERE TO PASS!
                
                   she doesn't TEACH you anything, she just talks at you. She's not easy to talk to and doesn't care if you do well in her class. I do not recommend that anyone take her class, she's not very helpful AT ALL. Save yourself, and stay away from her class. it is a complete waste of time.
                
                   Lecture is boring, especially at 8AM.  Attendance is mandatory, has 2 in class extra credits.  Only has online quiz every week and 4 exams. MAKE SURE YOU DO ONLINE QUIZZES. 2 attempts and timed 10 question quiz.  Not the worst, not the best
                
                   DR. EPLEY was awesome. She makes class fun and interesting. I was expecting to be a boring class. In order to pass the class you must go to class because she takes roll every class.  Her tests and quizes are online so its basically open notes ! Also she has a group work and a online hw. Just Do It !! Its super easy !!
                
                   Best professor in the whole planet. Group work sucks though, Unless you were lucky enough to be assigned with good organized individuals. 
                
                   She does powerpoints mostly in class, homework is online, test are also online. The only thing was that she doesn't really care if your group mates dont do their part or not. Group members are assigned to you. If you do definitions for chapters it helps a lot on test. She does help with assignments if you need it.
                
                   she's horrible!  she rants, gives zeros for the stupid CSAR BS she has you do, lectures are pointless to go to because you basically teach yourself. I really dont know why shes getting paid since I teach myself. Shes just not a good professor at all, so please save yourself and avoid her. 
                
                   Although her exams are online and you do not have lecture on the days of the exams, the exams are super tough. There are 4 exams (each worth 15%) (not found on google or quizlet), weekly homework assignments online that are usually due before class (20%) and 5 essay like paper that you do in assigned groups (she assigns your groups) (20%). 
                
                   She is very excited about teaching, but has many online homework assignments, 1 or 2 due each week(20% of grade). Also has groups you work with on 5 "CSAR" assignments (25% of grade) (groups also randomly selected by her). Has four online exams(each worth 15%)(not found on google or quizlet), but no cumulative final exam. Overall okay teacher.
                
                   To me this class was difficult. Read assigned chapter. Must complete all connect Lucas assignments for twenty percent and complete five csar assignments for another twenty percent. The four test count as sixty percent. The work is easy the tests were hard and since they are timed it is a lot of pressure. Sixty question test must be done in an hour.
                
                   I LOVE DR. EPLEY! She is so charismatic and up-to-date! She makes class fun and interesting. Not what I was expecting a political science class to be like. You must go to class and she does take roll daily, but it is not a bad class to have to show up to. Show up, do your work (which is easy), and learn how to change the world :) She's a rockstar!
                
                   Her class is AMAZING. If you don't show up to class, and not be committed to her work then you will most likely FAIL. The homeworks are easy, and She doesn't give anything OUTRAGEOUS. I would recommend her for all freshman students because it is a fun class, and you will laugh. Attendance is the key as well as doing the homework on time to success.
                
                   Dr. Epley is AWESOME!!! Expect to do the work but she doesn't ask you to do anything outrageous!  VERY VERY ORGANIZED A+++++ knew before went to class what was going to be discussed.  Will do what she can to help you succeed but you have to put forth the effort. She won't do it for you, she's not your mother!  Meet with her/know her, she's great!
                
                   Tests are very easy, all online and all homework online. Believes that there should be small grades throughout the semester, rather than a few big grades. Helps you earn better grades and less pressure on the student. She's a good teacher and tends to focus on topics that pertain to our generation.
                
                   She is passionate about what she does and loves her job. She is very willing to help the student however she can. She requires the student to do A LOT of unnecessary, time consuming, and unhelpful homework. The homework takes up a lot of time that can be spent on more important classes. Do not take her if you can help it. Not worth the time/effort.
                
                   She is very passionate about what she teaches, kudos for that. However, it seems as though she puts everything on the exams(there are 5, instead of the usual 3) EXCEPT for what we are taught and told to read. A lot of HW assignments. Don't take her class if you don't expect to pull all of your time towards it.
                
                   shes really likes what she teaches and makes the learning prcess fun. The tests are average and there is a lot of in class work, even though attendance is not mandatory you have to go a lot for the in class stuff in order to keep your grade up.
                
                   Class, tests, and assignments were not difficult. RCN's were time-consuming, but hey, that's college. Lecture slides provided outlines to hasten RCN assgnmts. She adjusted mid-semester to extend RCN deadlines due to student response. She's very open and energetic. Tests really were pretty easy. Do what you're assigned and you'll be good.
                
                   her class was extremely easy, the tests are too easy, and her rcn's come straight from the book. for the tests, all you have to do is study vocab and the website for the book she posts on her black board module.
                
                   Very difficult class. She expects students to think waaaay outside the box and understand scenerios rather than the tetbook eplanation. Her tests weren't too long but the questions were unusual. I did not enjoy this class and I have only met 1 person that did well in her class.
                
                   A serious woman! Lots of stuff everyday! Many students failed in her class. If you work hard you will pass, but no good grades. 5 major tests,4 parts:multiple choice, ture/false, fill in the blanks, short answers, each problem 1 points, in all 100 points. Take study notes as she asked at home, she will check. She never see your efforts.
                
                   A serious Indonesian woman! Very hard class, and many students failed. Many quizes and 5 major test one semester.Test have parts: multiple choices, true and false, fill in the blanks, and short answers. Each problem worth 1 points. You also need to make notes in her way, and she will check. If you work hard, you will pass, but no good grades.
                
                   She makes you learn all the states and capitals and know how to locate them even though this is political science not geography. I didn't like this class at all. You must read from your book every week and she gives quizes over the states and capitals every week.
                
                   I LOVE HIM HE IS THE BEST
                
                   Dr. Dillard was one of the best teachers I've ever had. He puts up all of his power points on his Blackboard page before each test. He is very clear when teaching the material and keeps you interested with funny videos that are relevant to the class, extra-credit opportunities, and speaks to you without being condescending, as teachers can be.
                
                   Absolutely the best Pol Sci teacher in the department. His teaching goes beyond the books and allows for classroom discussion. 
                
                   I loved having him.  He made his lectures fun and made sure that he always had some kind of relevant news clip or family guy clip in them.  Plus if you let him know you have to miss class he works with you. He also puts all his power points on blackboard.  I would take him again any day!
                
                   Easiest class I've taken so far!
                
                   This is the best professor I've had so far. I had him for two classes last semester and night class and an 8am class. He made it so easy to want to go to class. Class was nota factory but you didn't want to miss it. He makes learning to material so entertaining. I by far learned the most in his class. I highly recommend this professor!
                
                   Great instructor. He uses material that keeps class fun and exciting, makes everyone laugh. He is willing to work with you on tests and homework and minimally uses the book for assignments.
                
                   Best Prof. Made learning POLS fun and actually made me want to go to class. Willing to work with you on arranging missed exams. Easy going and his teaching methods make learning the material easier.
                
                   The best professor I've ever had
                
                   She is a very knowledgable professor on the subject matter she teaches.   You must show up to class and pay attention.  Notes on board - no power points!  Take good notes.  Gives study guide but only for potential essay questions and not for the terms!  She was my most challenging professor this semester, but I still made a B- but wasn't easy.
                
                   I have taken Dr. Arledge multiple times and she is awesome. Just pay attention, take good notes, and study for the tests and you can make an A. She makes it clear how to be successful and gives reviews for tests.
                
                   Fantastic professor! Writes outline for lectures on the board at the beginning of class. Blackboard and PPT are not used. 3 tests 3 writing assignments and one final (20 points added to your total if you have met the attendance criteria). 
                
                   She gives you some time to get to class, and writes the outline on the board and THEN gives attendance. Make sure you go to class, because that's what's basically on the exams, her SI instructor isn't too great, and her writing assignments aren't too bad. Definitely take her for your basic political science classes, she's awesome!
                
                   Very good lecturer, she comes in every morning and begins writing on the board an outline of her lecture, then she takes attendance and begins. If you listen to her while she lectures and take notes, you'll do fine. For tests, study the notes more than the book review she gives. Tests are 50 multiple choice questions. Very good class
                
                   DIFFICULT. Attendance is more or less mandatory. Book is as well. She gives extra points if you have few absences. I would say only about 40% of the material in the book and review is represented on tests. Study group & I couldn't figure it out. Went by office 3x; unavailable. No return calls or e-mails. In class she just said to stop by office! 
                
                   She only has 3 writing assignments and 3 tests (plus the final). She's very easy to understand and it isn't hard to pay attention. However, her tests were a little difficult, because she DOES NOT give study guides, so take GOOD NOTES!
                
                   Class is extremely easy when attend class. Is not mandatory but receive extra points at end of semester if have few absences. Teaching style is off of board not powerpoint but still understandable. Have 3 writing assignments but only 2 count, so do well on first two and don't have to worry about last one. Hate pols but easy class
                
                   Beware while her classes are very easy, her liberal beliefs come out in her lectures.
                
                   She only ever assigns a few assignments. The in class writings are not difficult and she doesnt grade too hard. The tests can be easy if you attend class and take good notes.
                
                   As a poli sci major and one who lives and breaths politics on a daily basis, I know and can see when a professor is bias or not with pushing their politics on students. She's one of the most bias professors in the department, and it's not like I made a bad grade in her class and that's why I'm giving her a bad review. I just can't stand bias.
                
                   I am really terrible at ANYthing government or politics, but she is a great teacher. she will repeat stuff thats important and gives you time to write it down. her tests are from the book not the notes! but she takes attendance and that helps. shes very unbiased when she teaches and i respect that.
                
                   Sosa made the class extremely interesting. He knew what he was talking about and was well prepared. You had to do the work to get the grade you wanted, but nothing was particularly difficult as long as you paid attention. Would take again
                
                   If you attend class you will do fine. He is very clear on expectations. 
                
                   Dr lenchner is a great professor! He cares about his students and  tries to keeps the subject interesting!
                
                   Good teacher and knowledgeable about the content. Has a good sense of humor in his own way. My only advice is not to sit in the front row, you might get spit on.
                
                   He is just old fashion! But u gotta love um! The lecture is easy to understand and the test are not that bad. just pat attention..... o yeah NO CELL PHONES!!!!! LOL
                
                   He is a great guy. You will like him as long as you give him a chance to grow on you.
                
                   Sims are a blast! that is the best part of his classes. I was told not to take him before i signed up, but i am so glad that i did. His lectures arent great, but, if you like politics and simulations..opinions will go far!
                
                   This grandpa needs to retire.  He don't care for students.  He is still interested in playing games with his calculator to see if he can fail someone.  WARNING! Take class with someone who cares to teach and not to fail.
                
                   If possible take someone else!
                
                   Dr. Lenchner is the best professor I've had thus far in my experience in the TAMUC system. I recommend Dr. Paul Lenchner to any student interested in Political Science. He presents the materials with a sense of humor and clear approach. Grades are so so.
                
                   His class is easy. His sense of humor and incessant babbling may get on your nerves, but overall I would recommend the class as an easy one.
                
                   He is rude sometimes and doesn't make thingds clear.
                
                   great guy, very helpful, very professional. good professor.
                
                   Great teacher!
                
                   He is good but does not know how to go about exams.  i.o., he does not help prepare for his exams!
                
                   No Comments
                
                   This guy is funny and easy to understand... It was very easy to make an A
                
                   He is so funny class is never boreing, he gives excellent pretest outlines and notes and the simulations he has you do actually teach you things.
                
                   Is the most pC person I know.  Will go the extra mile not to offend ANYONE.
                
                   Tests are pretty tough. Do not just write down notes on the slideshow, write down what he says too. This class is not an easy A, but I kind of enjoyed. Theres a lot of group discussion and he tries to be open to everybody's political opinion. Show up to class. Do not miss the homework. He does not give exam reviews. He does not email notes. 
                
                   He is not a very good professor - at ALL. His grading process is horrible. He takes forever to grade things, not to mention the tests are really difficult to do well on. Government is one of my worst subjects, but I took it dual credit in high school and got an A. Hopefully I'll be able to pull out a C in his class. Just take somone else.
                
                   Awful! Goes over some information but doesn't explain anything. Tests are extremely hard and there are only 3 so they are 30% of your grade EACH. Leaving 10% for debate papers, or essays. I attended every class, turned in everything good and on time and took notes and still almost failed. Take a different teacher. 
                
                   He is by far one of the worst professors I've ever had. Given he is very knowledgeable about the subject. His tests however, almost impossible  I was shooting for an A in every single class this semester and ill be lucky if i escape this one with a C. I have never failed a history course either and made and A in my last Poli Sci. STEER CLEAR!!!
                
                   He is not a very good Professor. He did not give many assignment and when he did the grading scale was 0% 50% 75% or 100% so it was very easy to fail and assignment or get a C. He did not give enough time on Quizzes as well. He offers some extra credit and it still did not help i have to retake this class and Political Science is my major very sad.
                
                   This class is ridiculous! Although he was very passionate about the subject and he made the lectures fun his tests were almost impossible to pass. Even with reading the chapter and reviewing notes the tests were made to trick you. He as a professor was honestly pretty cool but he counts the tests as 75% of your grade so just be prepared. 
                
                   She tries to make class interesting and is very laid back. She also gives us time before class to talk about any current events that are happening and gives everyone a chance to discuss. It's not just her lecturing. She also gets the students involved and asks us questions. 
                
                   Nice guy. New to teaching. Does everything he can to meet you in the middle. Definitely recommend!
                
                   Professor Baily makes the extra effort to help students succeed. He understands when illness and family problems effect attendance etc. and is willing to plan course requirements around that.
                
                   Great professor; very straightforward class. 95% of the exams come straight from what he goes over in class, and the rest comes from reading, which is only about 10-15 pages. He also makes key points obvious by repeating them. Exams are not hard at all as long as you take good notes during class, study them, and do the reading. Highly recommend.
                
                   He WILL put you to sleep. However, he is a great man. Approachable. His international relations class was not very demanding, however it is decently reading dense. Easy test. 3 test of about 10 short answer questions. You should be able to make an A.  
                
                   Tarar is a very friendly, helpful professor. He has a few quirks as an individual, but that makes him all the better teacher.
                
                   Young, funny, & cool. If you took AP Government in High School, it's the same exact thing, just with a newer book. He reviews before tests and the tests are multiple choice. You don't have to put in a lot of outside time for this class. Love this class.
                
                   He lectures every class, but they are almost exactly like the slides he uses. If you miss class, everything you need to know is posted in his slides. You will have to study for tests, but not much. He only takes about 2 or 3 questions from the book per exam so reading isn't really necessary. I really enjoyed his class, he's a great teacher!
                
                   Roblyer is a very good professor. His lectures are clear and concise. His tests almost always match the slides and the textbook. He also offers extra credit and an optional final to replace your lowest test score if you tank an exam. Overall, he's the best professor I've ever had at A&M and deserves my respect as a teacher.
                
                   I pretty much stopped going to class after the first because all he did was read from the powerpoint slides and the test comes directly from these and some articles/videos within them. I barely even had to study for this class and made high A's on his tests. Extra credit adds three points to your overall final grade
                
                   He's a very prepared professor. He's very organized and posts his lectures. Still go to class because when you only read it, it doesn't make sense. He helps you make sense of it. Gives tons of guidance on grades and how to study and has opportunities for extra credit. Great professor!
                
                   Just go to class and listen to his lectures. His test questions come straight from the powerpoint's. Also if you ever need help go to his office hours it will help, trust me.
                
                   Tests become easier with more exposure, but there are only 4. There is an optional Final exam which is cumulative, these tests are the only components of your grade learn the material on the slideshows.
                
                   Dr. Roblyer is a great guy all around, friendly and easy to talk to! His lectures are the test so if you plan on skipping don't expect an A. He works for and with you so long as you ask for it, always has question times and office hours are a great resource. He gives extra credit and has an optional final to help out those of us that need it. 
                
                   I absolutely loved Dr. Roblyer. He genuinely wants you to succeed and will do what he can to help you. His lectures are helpful and informative. He understands that most people take his class because its required, so he doesn't make it unnecessarily hard. Overall, a great prof
                
                   awesome prof
                
                   Dr. Roblyer REALLY cares about the students here at A&M! He not only wants us to succeed, but also wants to make sure that we are learning how to become better students so that we can continue to succeed in the future. He is extremely generous with his time and office hours and also offers extra credit opportunities. Take him if you can!
                
                   The BEST prof I've ever had. His number 1 objective is making sure you succeed. He provides plenty of feedback and help. You do have to know the material well but it's a pretty easy class. Do not waste your time with the book. His exams come from material on slides and his lectures. Definitely take him for 206/207.  Gives extra credit too!
                
                   Several reviews comment on his desire for his students to succeed and they are 100% correct.  You do have to know your material for the tests, but everything is covered in lecture.  No surprises!  He is very accommodating on his grading (curve/extra credit).  I will absolutely take him again for 207.  ONLINE book access required, but no hardcopy.
                
                   Dr. Roblyer is easily the best professor I've ever had.  Goes out of his way to make sure he is doing everything he can to help you succeed.  He posts all of his slides online and communicates with all the students very well.  He even invited anyone who was staying home for Thanksgiving to come to his home.  He definitely cares about his students.
                
                   Take this man right now. He is the one of the best professors I have ever had. His exams are taken directly from the lecture slides and he makes a point for you to understand the material. Even if you show up to his 8 am in a half dead state it is still possible to absorb all the information you'll need and get an easy A.
                
                   Dr. Roblyer is a great prof and awesome person! He truly cares for your grade in his class and cares about your success in life. He gives extra credit (3 points added to overall course grade) and it's really easy. His tests can be tricky if you don't pay attention but they're still pretty easy. Amazing prof and amazing person!!
                
                   Professor Roblyer is an excellent lecturer who makes things interesting and forces you to think. He really cares about his students learning and gives his students every chance to succeed and get a good grade in his class. there is no work outside of studying for test and extra credit in his class. I highly recommend that you take him.
                
                   I can't say enough about Dr. Roblyer. He is very helpful and deeply cares about his students. He responds quickly to emails concerning his class, and teaches directly off of the slides. The class consists of 4 exams worth 25% each, requires minimal studying to succeed. Opened up his home on thanksgiving for people who didn't go back home! Get him!
                
                   He's an amazing, passionate professor. Always posts the slides online, so I didn't find it was a complete necessity to always go to class. Although the tests can be difficult, he gives extra credit (including an optional final exam) and always goes over tests so you can do better. 
                
                   Dr. Roblyer is a great prof. He's a really smart guy and he really cares about his students learning the information. His lectures are well-structured but he keeps it interesting. I'm not a big fan of gov but I'm definitely lucky I got him as a professor.
                
                   Dr Roblyer is definitely a smart guy and extremely passionate for political science. Although you HAVE to pay attention during his lectures and you have to write down everything he says and study that along with the textbook. If you just read the textbook the tests will be hard. Besides that he's a great teacher and always willing to help. 
                
                   Talks fast but knows the material. Very helpful outside of class. Brings in lots of research examples. Exams are easy since he covers everything in class and in the review.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Dr. Perry is a great prof. I loved my semester with her. For me, it was an easy A, but that's because I made sure to show up and take notes. I didn't open the book expect for the first exam, but the key to passing in understanding the vocab. The terms she's highlights can't just be memorized, make sure you know what she's saying and you'll do well.
                
                   10/10 would definitely take her class again! She's full of enthusiasm and genuinely wants all of her students to succeed. She doesn't post her lecture slides so you can't really miss class. Reading the textbook and taking detailed notes will help because some of her test questions aren't covered in lecture. One of the nicest professors I've had.
                
                   You definitely need to read the book some because the lectures are just summaries of the chapters, and the test questions go more in depth. However she's very nice and she'l keep you awake during lectures with her energy and enthusiasm.
                
                   I definitely recommend taking Pols206 with her. She is a great professor who cares about her students. She gave extra credit and bonus questions on a test. Its a required course and she makes the class a lot more enjoyable. I find myself using a lot of concepts and terms we learned in this class in my everyday life. She's that good.
                
                   The class was interesting and actually kind of fun some days. Professor is very down to earth and keeps the class light. She has a slight liberal prospective that shows through the videos she shows (NPR and Daily Show), but she tries to get out of her own way and balance the argument.
                
                   She really made me respect and enjoy the political science field! She's super passionate about research and answers our questions well, and if she doesn't know the answer, she gets back to us as quick as possible. She's also helpful during office hours and it helped me feel more comfortable about the class. Would love to take her again!
                
                   I don't normally post reviews for professors, but after reading some negative ones, I feel I need to. Dr. Perry is a young, excited bubbly professor who really loves to teach. Her lectures can drag on, but as long as you take notes (copy the slides!) And study, it's a very very easy A. My easiest A class since freshman year.
                
                   Dr. Perry is a fantastic professor her enthusiasm makes this class great! Its always fun to have a younger professor who keeps class entertaining and exciting! The test are fair they are not hard at all. I personally did not buy any textbooks or did any readings all i studied was class notes and reviews she would post and still earned an A! 
                
                   I never really like government classes in high school, so I was dreading going into this class. I have to say though, professor Perry made the class easy to understand and enjoyable. There is a TON of reading, and it isn't the most exciting either but as long as you do the reading and pay attention in class you'll have an easy A!
                
                   This is definitely my hardest class this semester, but it isn't the worst POLS I can imagine. If you have a passion for politics then 100% take Perry but if you're just taking it because it's required theres an easier class out there for you.
                
                   Dr. Perry has been one of the best professors I've ever had. She has an amazing personality and keeps class interesting with videos and group dicussions. One thing that made her stand out is that she is very bipartisan when it comes to class and purposefully prevented us from those dicussions, which is rare for a POLS prof. 10/10 would take  again!
                
                   Perry keeps class interesting with videos and humor.  2 midterms and a cumulative final and clicker participation (for attendance) are the only grades. She had powerpoints that she does not post that are almost directly from the book. I enjoyed her class and would take a course with her again.
                
                   Professor Perry made the class as fun as it can be. She always had funny videos to go along with her lectures. In addition, her personality made the class better. The class is not an easy A but if you put in even just one hour of studying you should do well. Go to class! Her tests are very lecture specific. 
                
                   Dr. Perry was an amazing professor! Her lectures were both interesting and hilarious. Her tests were very fair- she gives weekly reading assignments and explains most of the assigned material in class with great examples. There were a total of 3 exams in addition to an attendance grade. Her class is very entertaining, so you'll want to go!
                
                   Really nice lady. Her tests are straight from her lectures, but she doesn't put them online so you'll really need a friend or two in the class to get notes from if you miss. There are only three tests in that class, with the last one being worth a lot (I think 35%) so study with your notes and the textbook.
                
                   She really wants all of her students to pass. I took her for honors and she gave us a review sheet for every exam that covered more than we needed. I didn't read the book at all. Just read/watch the extra links she puts up and you're good. Her multiple choice questions are straight from the slides (which she doesn't post) so go to class/take notes!
                
                   Perry was a wonderful teacher and maybe I just didn't understand her teaching style. I often found myself lost during lectures. She does challenge you its not straight forward. 
                
                   American government is about as fun as a sack of beans but it's good to know. Dr. Perry presents the information in powerpoints that she doesn't post. Make sure to read the textbook and go to class because there are clicker questions that make up a chunk of your grade. It doesn't matter if you get them right as long as you participate. Easy A/B!
                
                   Funny, clear, extremely helpful. Always stays after class to answer any questions. Responds quickly to emails, whether they're about a topic in class, current event, or anything else. Makes the lectures fun. Pay attention and read the book, your tests will go great. You should go to all the lectures, but she won't get mad if you skip occasionally.
                
                   Class consisted of 2 exams and 10 page research paper that you can do w partner. SUPER easy class! Gives exam reviews which is the only thing you need the book for! Such an interesting, experienced professor! Looks like Mark Ruffalo! You can skip class without getting behind!
                
                   SUPER easy. There are 3 tests. The class before each one he will tell you exactly what will be on it. The third test is a little tricky compared to the first two but nothing terrible as long as you study. As long as you study what he says to for each test you should get an A.
                
                   Professor Pacek was an awesome professor! I would recommend him to anyone taking political science classes. He does a review that is pretty much an outline for the exam. His exams are not cumulative and half lecture-based, half reading-based. You don't have to go to lecture but I always did because they were funny and interesting.
                
                   This guy is very easy. He gives you a review sheet containing all the questions for the exam before each exam. His first two tests are easy A's. His last one is quite hard and is the test that tends to throw people to a B as people become careless by the end of the semester. I am warning you. An 88  is an A.
                
                   to expalin how good I think this professor is, I will say this:  I signed up for 3 classes in different comparative politics classes. Pacek's lecture is entertaining and clear to understand.  His Exams are not surprises trying to trap you.
                
                   This was my favorite class of the semester- Politics of the Former Soviet Union. You don't have to attend class but it is really interesting material so you don't want to miss it! Go to review sessions- he gives you questions straight from the test. Take this class!
                
                   Dr. Nederman's class was difficult, but interesting. His lectures are entirely discussion-based and are pretty entertaining. Grades consisted of 500 word papers every 2 weeks and 2 major papers. He is a very tough grader and will tear your grammar apart. There is also a lot of reading: 7 books in total. I managed to make an A, but it wasn't easy. 
                
                   Dr. Nederman is a great prof. His lectures are entirely discussion-based and there is a lot of reading (6 books). Grades consist of only 3 tests which were all essay and he does grades them somewhat critically. He is really approachable and personable and he is very passionate about the subject. It's plausible to make an A, you just have to read.
                
                   Cary is a good professor but there is a ton of books and reading that you have to do in order to pass the class. The lectures are good but his idea of a test (which are all papers) is your ability to write what you think and apply the theme of the class to it, and not simply rewrite his lectures. It is hard to read all these books. Very challenging
                
                   He's by far the coolest professor I've ever had. He is always on call if you need help. His class is discussion based, and he loves hearing new ideas. He grades every test manually and gives a lot of feedback. Lots of reading but his lessons clarify everything. Warning: If you don't like loud professors-I suggest taking someone else.
                
                   Super enthusiastic and really makes you want to learn about the material, I would take a class from him again if I could. Go to class, the lectures fly by and he gives you everything you need to know in his lectures. 
                
                   Very hard grader! Came in with a 3.82 GPA, I studied all course material and still made 45-65% on tests & essays. Dr. McLean is very knowledgeable but focuses the course entirely on her own works and grades critical responses and critics harshly. Also, EVERY assignment was moved back/around because she travels a lot. Tl;dr: A hard grader, avoid!
                
                   Great Lecture, do not need the book at all. Test are straight from what she says so you just have to attend class and take good notes. To study for the exam just read over your notes like 2 times.
                
                   She does a good job of speaking clearly during lecture, but they drag on forever, at least the Tuesday/Thursday class, and and she speaks fast and the entire time so you have to be a pretty attentive note taker. I'll admit that I never went to office hours so I can't attest to that, but she WILL NOT answer questions during class.
                
                   Lectures are interesting, worth going to even though they're not mandatory. Take good notes and pay attention because tests are extremely tough if you don't know your stuff including little details. Don't even think of asking a question during the test for clarification, she just restates your question. Skimmed the textbook, wasn't really worth it.
                
                   You have to attend lectures and take good notes. I never touched the textbook. The test questions were straight from the lectures. Very straight forward. Three tests (25%,35%,40%). No final. No quizzes. No homework.
                
                   This was an incredibly hard class. All of her class are lecture based, so if you don't go, you won't pass. The test are really difficult, so you really have to study the lecture notes, if you want to think about passing. her lectures are not posted online.
                
                   I attended pretty much all classes and skimmed the chapters before each test but only 3 tests make up the grade. No chances for extra credit, no attendance score, nothing BUT these tests, I made 86, 90, 88 But i felt l studied much harder for them and still showed no improvement. questions looked for small details instead of broad concepts
                
                   Go to lecture and study for the tests. She is a good professor and is super prepared for every lecture, but the tests are hard and they are the only grades. Also, if you buy some cheap lecture notes off of luvo that will help a lot for studying.
                
                   Awesome lectures. She gives you all the information you need if you just write down everything she says. Only three tests all weighted differently... no attendance, assignments or extra credit. Very nice woman. I would take her again. Ended up with an A in the class. 
                
                   While the attendance is not mandatory, I would suggest going to every class. If you take notes on what she says then you will get an  A on all test. I skimmed the textbook and only missed one question on each of the last test. They are exactly what she says in lecture with a few extra terms from the textbook. 
                
                   Lipsmeyer is a great professor! Her lectures are very clear and she makes it easy to take notes. You must go to class and TAKE GOOD NOTES if you want a good grade. She always stays after class to answer any questions you may have. There are only a few questions on the test that come from the book! Definitely would take her again! 
                
                   I would definitely take this professor again! She is passionate about what she teaches and uses multiple examples to explain things. GO TO CLASS! Lectures are not online and if you don't go you will fail! Test are mostly lecture but make sure to go through the book at least once just to make sure. Not an easy class, you have to work for it!
                
                   she's an awesome lecturer, just study how she says and you'll do well
                
                   Dr. Lipsmeyer was my favorite teacher this yet. Her lectures are captivating and entertaining. The tests are hard but she gives you the information you need to know if you go to class. Highly recommend!
                
                   Amazing professor, if you show up to every lecture and take good notes you can get an A or B  in the class. Tests are pretty much straight from the lectures, don't really need to read the book. 
                
                   She keeps the lectures interesting and you have to pay attention and cant skip because her tests are from the lecture. she gives a review sheet before each exam. no final
                
                   The tests are tough and the reviews vague... I think this is really to only help the student though. She expects your knowledge of the class to be malleable in that you can twist it around to see how things changed, how they can be applied through different time periods. Funny and very reliable. As long  as you take good notes, should be fine.
                
                   I really like Dr. Lipsmeyer. Her tests are extremely difficult, but she makes the class enjoyable and is a great teacher. You only have 3 tests in the class and no final. Study hard and do exactly as she tells you and you will be fine. I would recommend her. Make sure to go to class or you won't pass. Her exams are 90% based off of lectures.
                
                   All grades come from the tests. Most test content came from her lectures. Isn't very specific when it comes to the test reviews. Her tests are hard, I suggest reading the book and just knowing everything basically.
                
                   Must attend lectures; tests are 90% covered by her lecture material. Read the book and take good notes. Not easy, but if you study it isn't challenging. She really makes the lectures interesting too; she is easy to listen to and very likable. 
                
                   Her tests are very straight forward and no tricks, easy A's. As for her lectures, attendance is not mandatory, but everyone who has taken her can agree that class attendance is the highway to that A; her lectures are only pictures and are not provided online, however, she outlines every lecture so your notes are always organized. Everyone take her!
                
                   LOVE her. very fair teacher and she is down to earth.
                
                   By far the best professor I've had. I highly recommend her. It's an easy A
                
                   I would absolutely recommend this professor! She's good at explaining concepts and she gives two opportunities to earn extra credit.
                
                   This is a great professor and for someone that just wants to meet the requirements or like the subject, she is the best professor overall. I had another profeesor and barely passed but with this professor, made an A and she is flexible with your schedule as long as you meet with her ahead of time. I recommend her to everyone.
                
                   Take her class!!  She is a fun person and makes class enjoyable even if you don't particulary like the subject.  Lecture ended early every time.  She is very clear in her presentations but she does move quickly so having a laptop to type notes is ideal.  She also provides reviews for each tests.  There are quizes online but are simple and open note
                
                   His lectures were phnomenol, and straight forward.  he made it interesting by using examples that are relevent to our times. A great teacher.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Soren was an awesome teacher. He truly cares about his students and loves political science. I never thought I would enjoy this class but I did and I actually learned a lot. He doesn't try to trick you on tests its just simply a test on your knowledge. If you study, you will do well; if you don't study, you won't do well. TAKE HIM  HES AWESOME. 
                
                   Soren is my favorite prof. at A&M so far. If you read and go to class his tests are easy. If you do not put in effort you proably wont do well. Soren was super funny I enjoyed going to his class and he cared about his students and learned my name. Super helpfull in office hours. His class is all being able to apply knowledge. 
                
                   Tests ARE challenging but passable and not even so hard that you can't ace them. Experienced students shouldn't be scared away from Dr. Jordan just because of the reviews saying his tests are so hard. Very helpful in office hours and very passionate in class about the subjects. Put in the required time and effort and an A or a B is very realistic.
                
                   The Tests were very hard and he wasn't clear in his questions regarding government or the public in general. Would not recommend taking him. He makes lectures seem easy along with the reading and then asks the hardest possible questions. 
                
                   Jordan is a good professor, his lecture notes are posted online so all you have to do is show up and listen. Three tests, non cumulative, over mostly lecture and the book material. He gives tons of extra credit to make up for the difficulty of the tests, which are mostly conceptual rather than fact based. 
                
                   Soren was awesome! He's goofy and makes his lectures pretty entertaining; for POLS that is. Only 3 tests and about half of each test is over textbook material. He does offer quite a bit of extra credit. Overall, I'd take him again in a heartbeat.
                
                   Soren is very laid back and posts all lectures online so you do not have to go to class but you do have to read the book, his tests are super tough but normally everyone fails them so he gives tons of extra credit. Only 3 tests, non cumulative. 
                
                   Hilarious and very sarcastic but entertaining in lecture. Tests are complex and require being able to connect ideas and concepts from class and readings. Tests are fairly difficult but not impossible.
                
                   Professor Goodine is very passionate about the subject he teaches. His lectures are slide-based, but the majority of your notes will be from what he says rather than from the slides. His grades consisted of 3 tests (half of the questions were from the book and the other from class) that were very difficult and had high failure rates.
                
                   Fulton provides resources to help you succeed. The only thing I suggest is definitely going to class. Unless you have friends in there willing to give you notes, attendance is mandatory otherwise you're stuck. She offers a lot of office hours though so the help is definitely there if you need it. Make sure to study as well.
                
                   doesn't always let you copy down every slide because she always zooms through power-point & not helpful to go to office hours. If you take this class I hope you have fast fingers and patients for a boring lecture.
                
                   Dr. Fulton's class is pretty easy if you show up. Her lectures come straight from the powerpoint, but you have to go to class in order to get it. The tests are mostly from lecture, but there are some questions from the book. Lectures can be long and boring. She can be kind of sassy sometimes, but I personally thought it was funny.
                
                   Not the most friendly teacher, but encourages everyone to visit her office hours.   She curved every test by at least 6 points which was great.  She gives a review that helped a lot on the tests.  I never read the textbook and got an A on every test, just make sure not to skip because she doesn't post her ppt slides online anywhere.
                
                   The only grades in the class were 3 tests. She lets you write a paper for 1 extra credit point added to your final grade. Her tests are based off her lectures. She does not post PowerPoints online. The classes can be a little long, but she makes Political Science interesting. Take notes and read the chapters, and you can get an A in the class.
                
                   Her class was not easy. Her lectures are long and not very interesting. She tends to repeat herself a lot. You must attend class, take good notes, and READ the text book. If you do not like doing one of those things than you won't pass the class. Her test can also be very tricky. She offers one extra credit assignment. 
                
                   She is very nice and interesting at times. Three test in the semester, super easy if  you go to class, take good notes and read the book. 
                
                   Lectures are clear. Tests are super easy if you come to class and read the book. Grading is very fair. She makes her expectations known. There was an extra credit opportunity, and she posts test reviews for every test.
                
                   Sarah Fulton was a decent professor; however could be very rude if you came to her for help. overall its a hard class if you don't try. 
                
                   Great professor that truly cares about her students and what she teaches. She offers an extra credit opportunity, but the exams are pretty tough and there are only three. Reading is essential, but I highly recommend this professor.
                
                   Pretty dull lectures. I was semi-interested and wanted to learn about politics, but it was hard to get into.  
                
                   Great professor, repetitive. You don't need to read the book if  you want a B! If you want an A, you should read the book, which isn't horribly bad! GO TO CLASS. She doesn't take attendance, but more than half of her exam comes from lecture. 
                
                   i found her pretty interesting. the class will be an easy B if you go to class, and not hard to make an A if you read the assigned sections in the book
                
                   She's very clear in explaining everything and she repeats herself multiple times to make sure the students are getting the idea. I did not read a single page in the book and made a high B. You have to go to class!! The 3 tests are made up of what she goes over in lecture. Tests are not cumulative.
                
                   Only time I read the book was to fill in the test review she gives, even then I only read the parts that pertained to the review. As long as you put in the effort you will get a good grade! 
                
                   You must go to class, she doesn't post any material online except for test reviews 
                
                   She repeats herself a lot but if you pay attention you will get everything you need to know out of the lecture. Simply put if you go you will do well if you skip you will fail.
                
                   She is a good prof, but you have to go to class. Test material is 50% lecture notes and 50% book.
                
                   Not the best professor. She read straight from her slides & often moved faster than you could write or type (you should type). Lectures were long & boring. There were only 3 tests that made up your overall grade. No final. I made a D on the first test. They were WORDY & LONG. Office hours did not help.
                
                   She reads off of her slides during lectures and doesn't give effort to help students learn. Doesn't care if you don't get everything written down during lectures. No help at all when going to see her in office hours. 
                
                   His tests were 95% right from his slides in lecture and maybe a couple questions from the reading in there. I got over a 94 on all my tests and pols has never been my thing. He doesn't post slides online, so you need to go to class for notes - but I found him interesting and enjoyed his class so it wasn't too much of a hassle.
                
                   He treats it like a intro class and realizes polisci isn't everyones cup of tea, 4 exams total unless you have an A average after the 3rd in that case you may omit the 4th, exams are highly lecture based with little content from the book if any. As long as you copy the slides down and study them there's no way you can get below a B.
                
                   Test questions come straight from the book and lectures, but are somewhat difficult. She is easy to understand and is very passionate about what she does. Unlimited tries on the homework assignments. No writing assignments were given, just multiple choice tests and homework assignments. 3 tests and a final, and she dropped the lowest score.
                
                   I loved this professor! Tests were alright, they were based off the lecture & the book (sometimes asked specific questions about lecture) Stayed after class a few times to discuss confusing concepts and she was very helpful. I definitely recommend her. Homework was an easy 100, gave you as many attempts as needed to retake the assignments.
                
                   She pulled test questions from both the book and her lectures, and they were all very specific. Her tests were extremely difficult. It seemed as if there were three right answers for every question and you had to pick the best out of the three. Her office hours only confused me more.
                
                   I came into this class excited about learning government, and left displeased. The prof is very knowledgeable but also very biased. While he allows students to discuss various topics, he usually tells you just how incorrect that viewpoint is. His multiple choice exams are hard even if you do ALL the reading, pay attention, and study.
                
                   Reading isn't that necessary, what she focuses on is on the powerpoints, from which she talks about during the lecture.  Lectures are pretty clear and simple. Uploads worksheets about what will be covered each day. Fill and study those worksheets and you're ready for your A
                
                   Only three tests and an optional final. Her lectures are straight from the power points and extremely drab and boring so I only went to class once a week and managed a B simply going over the material online. Didn't even need the book she made us buy. Wouldn't take this professor again, tests were worded strangely.
                
                   Just filled out her worksheets and read the book the day before the test. She puts all of her lecture slides online. Really easy to get an A if you read the book and fill out her worksheets. The class has three tests and an optional final that replaces your lowest test grade. No quizzes or homework 
                
                   If you're looking to get an easy POLS credit out of the way then this is your professor. 3 multiple-choice exams, The final is optional, and can only boost your grade if you take it. Just study the lecture slides and you'll be fine.
                
                   Professor Conway is one of the best teachers I have ever had at A&M. I looked forward to coming to his class everyday because his lectures were so intresting. He is a funny guy and keeps everything upbeat. He has 2 test and 6 quizzes in his class. Make sure you do good on the quizzes because they can make or break you. Would recommend him to anyone
                
                   Professor Conway is one of the best political science professors I have had at A&M. Lectures are slide-based and very entertaining and engaging. He also cold-calls people to make sure everyone read, so be ready for that. Grades consisted of six pop quizzes, two tests, and one extra credit paper. Do yourself a favor and take this professor!
                
                   If you need an easy teacher to take POLS 206, this is NOT the teacher to take. The majority of the test he gives out are based on the book he wrote so basically he kind of forcing you to buy his mixtape. The class consist only of test and attendance isn't required.
                
                   He is a really nice professor. His lectures are not really boring. He tries to make it easy for students to pass. He sometimes even says in lectures when something is important for the exam. He is funny in his own way. I would totally recommend you take the class. Read the book and attend class. If you do, you will get an  A.
                
                   There are only 3 test, so be ready from the start. READ or you won't do well! He wrote the book so a ton of his material in lectures and on the test is from the book. If you read and pay attention in lecture you should make an A (Learn from my mistake, I didn't read all of the chapters for Test 1 and got a C and I'll make a B in the class).  
                
                   His lectures are very clear cut and as long as you attend class and read the book it should be very easy to make an A. There are 2 midterms and a noncumlative final. Tests have a built in cushion. He is a very nice guy and posts note outlines online. 
                
                   This class is a very very boring political class. There are lots of notes to take and even more reading to do. The lectures themselves are pretty boring, I find myself messing around of my computer a lot. I definitely recommend taking notes on a lap top unless you are a very fast writer. LOTS OF READING
                
                   Dr. Bond takes attendance, but attending isn't required. Lectures are dry & boring, bring a laptop to play games or do other hw on. He uses fill in the blank notes that you NEED for tests. The only grades are 3 exams. The key to an A in this class is YOU MUST READ! Its an easy A if you read, I got a 100 in the class. Also, beware of "quiz day." :P
                
                   read and take notes from book. He gives an overview of the notes in class BUT these are just overviews and studying his notes alone  fail. Tests come straight from book. made a 65 on the first exam (didn't read all the chapters) and a 90 on second exam (thoroughly read all chapters) barely went to class. Don't take if you don't like reading.
                
                   Attendance is not required. He says you won't pass if you don't go, but if you read you'll be fine. He is rather arrogant. There are only 2 tests and a final, so you HAVE to do good on tests or you're screwed.
                
                   Lectures are so boring!!!  He wrote the books  just read that.
                
                   Read the textbook and take notes from it, take lecture notes. Use the textbook website he gives in the syllabus and go to the study sessions. There are 4 non cumulative exams. Use study blue dot com for references so you see how the questions are worded, test questions can be tricky. Don't underestimate this course. Read!!!
                
                   You have to read the chapters in order to make the grade. It's not necessary to attend class because he lectures straight from the book. It sucks, but if you read the chapters and study the vocab, you're guaranteed an A.
                
                   I would stray away from this prof. You have three grades the entire semester: 3 tests. And they are all difficult. Reading the textbook is pretty much mandatory for a solid grade. This is because he wrote the book! He expects you to read it all. He is boring and puts students to sleep. The way he teaches is not engaging at all.
                
                   Worst class that I have ever taken at A&M because of the prof. The material isn't too bad and he basically spoon feeds you material in class, however he is extremely boring and in my opinion a very poor teacher.
                
                   This is not an interesting class at all. He talks the whole time and it is almost impossible not to fall asleep. His tests aren't the hardest in the world, but they are difficult to study for. I stopped going to class about half way through the semester because it was pointless.
                
                   You need to read the book as well as attend class. His tests are difficult, but study and you will do fine.
                
                   Never liked his class. Still do not like his class. He has the same boring jokes and they aren't funny. Only 3 grades in this class, and all are tests. Wouldn't recommend his class to others.
                
                   Absolutely bombed the first test. I thought since he wrote the book, his notes would parallel that, but studying just the notes will get you a D. Second test, I actually read through the chapters and highlighted important things, went over the notes and highlighted topics before the test and made an A. I did the same for the final.
                
                   Lecture is a waste of time. Most of it is drivel. He tries to be funny sometimes, and that makes his lecture better. However, this class should be a gimmie and he makes tests unreasonably hard, especially since he usually doesn't cover most of the material seen in his tests.
                
                   Never went to class, just read his textbook (he wrote it) and you'll do fine on the exams. Only 3 exams total and he has a built in curve for each (Example: first exam was 60 questions but the grade was calculated out of 55)
                
                   Professor Bond is a very nice man OUTSIDE of class. His tests are ok....only if you read the 200 pages he assigns you to read. The only grades he has are 3 exam grades and that is it. No homework to help boost your score or attendence grades. The final is the third exam, so really only 2 exams and a final. I wouldn't take him again.
                
                   He is very unorganized, not much help when you have questions at least by email. It takes him almost until the last week of school to post any grades. His test are VERY tough and any required papers are even tougher.
                
                   Dr. Vick's class is very intense. Every week you have a written assignment that is to be formatted in APA guidelines. His exams are essay questions that frequently take several hours stretched over several days to complete. But by the end of the class you will have an absolute understanding of all the material covered. Difficult but worth it!
                
                   Awesome professor!  He keeps you in the loop, always available to answer questions, and even has a live chat forum every week for our online class.  I would recommend him to other students and plan on taking more of his courses in the near future!
                
                   I took his honors class and had a lot of fun in his lectures! It's the papers he asks you to write that are confusing! He doesn't explain them when you ask, all he does is tell you when it's due. Also if you are not reading the syllabus then half the time you don't know what's due. Great prof just wish he was more clear on what he wants you to do!
                
                   I took honors poli-sci with him and I absolutely love his class. He is very passionate about what he teaches and wants you to be able to see the truth and not only what the media tells you.
                
                   I agree with the previous student's comments. VERY, VERY unorganized. Assignments were NEVER clear. Poor grasp of online technology. When experienced students would offer helpful hints, he would always imply that it was the students that did not understand, even though in every case the problem identified would be his mistake. Very patronizing.
                
                   Contradicts himself in syllabus. Uses group assignments, and insists on APA. Informal style might work in classroom, but was confusing online. We were constantly emailing each other in efforts to understand assignments. Seems to not have a good command of the online program. ?Organization Theory? was very disorganized.  Avoid for online courses.
                
                   Dr. Vick is an interesting professor and is passionate about political science... however, students need to be on top of his syllabus.  He is unorganized and often forgets perameters of writing assignments and tests.  Tests are VERY difficult and gives to much work for the time given to take the tests.  But read and attend classes.
                
                   THE BEST PROFESSOR I EVER HAD. REGRETED I TRANSFERED TO ANOTHER SCHOOL. IF U REAALLY WANT TO KNOW WHAT POLITICS AND GOVT IS, TAKE THIS CLASS. DR. VICK WOULD TAKE YOU TO WASHINGTON WITHOUT YOU BEING THERE. WISHED I COULD TAKE HIM ALONG WITH ME. I KNOW MORE ABOUT HOW THINGS WORK IN US GOVT THRU MY GREATEST PROFESSOR. THANKS VICK, 'I DO DRUG TOO'LOL
                
                   Dr. Vick is awesome. He's funny and informative. He helps keep class interesting and and makes it so each topic is clear. This is definitely the class to take if you need Poly sci.
                
                   Ms. Stravato is amazing! She kept class fun and interesting with her blunt humor. Her tests are extremely easy. I would highly recommend!
                
                   Professor Stravato is by far the easiest professor I've ever had. If you can put up with her blunt opinions on controversital topics and rants about the government, you'll pass easily.  
                
                   Really easy class, but also insightful. She was a funny lady that keep you up to date on local events. She's awesome!
                
                   A wild eyed liberal and feminist!  Admittedly, she is funny, but the content she speaks of so vehemently is concerning.  I thought I was registered for a government class, not the ravings an obviously sad and angry woman. I could not spend an entire semester listening to her.
                
                   I love her! she is so funny. I agree with a lot of her opinions and enjoy her stories. She can appear abrasive to some people, but she really doesn't care. Minimal studying. Study guides=tests.
                
                   Easy. I think she likes sharing her opinions...A LOT. But its pretty entertaining. If at least one person speaks up about a conflict in class things get pretty interesting. You wont even have to study for this class. If your just trying to get your credits and don't care about Political Science take it! Study guide is identical to the test.
                
                   I enjoyed the class. She makes sure that you are informed on current events. Great class and the work is easy. Just tests and one oral report that is easy to do and give.
                
                   Really opinionated...
                
                   texas gov. easiest class i've ever taken. just read study guides!
                
                   Mrs. Robinson was and is one of the best professors I ever had. Not only is she able to step outside her own political beliefs, but she is super helpful and supportive of all her students who take the time to show up and ask questions!
                
                   Very bad at masking her party loyalties. Very easy class, but I did not learn much. It was useless listening in lecture, just sit and read the book and go over vocab and fill in the blank stuff.
                
                   
                
                   Took the course online and enjoyed it. The topics were interesting and he does a great job communicating with students.
                
                   I took his online class for state gov. It was a lot of work. Not necessarily hard work, just time consuming and a lot of it. Like every one else said he THINKS he is funny. I also took his intro. To poli. Sci. Class, the first day he showed us a YouTube video he made of him walking to class. He tries to connect with his students but really just looks more like a big dork.
                
                   One of the best professors at WT.  Very clear and organized and you will learn from him if you keep up and do the assignments!
                
                   He's helpful and fair.  Tries to make assignments interesting.  Not so bad if you can handle his humor.
                
                   Really fair teacher. Took online class. Excellent communication
                
                   A little goofy, but an overall good Professor.
                
                   Hard work but you can make it!
                
                   Took the class online, Very easy to follow instructions.  Gives chances for extra points, and most assignments are not very hard.
                
                   He is capable of making Social Science Statistics tolerable, is there any higher praise&#63; I appreciate his attempts to make class less dull and liven it up.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   This was an online statistics class. Dr. Rausch made this class easier to understand than the book did. He is a pretty good guy and a pretty good teacher. His humor is really dry and you have to appreciate it to like it. I would defnitely take a class with him again as well as reccommend him.
                
                   Online classes take a LOT of work!  Plus, he thinks he's funny.
                
                   He is great clear consise knows his stuff if ya show up and do the work your golden. passionate about what he teaches... awesome class great prof.
                
                   very interesting.  keeps things in perspective
                
                   He's really intresting and hot too! props for dr. parrish!!
                
                   I am beyond lucky to have this guy as the director of my major, Emergency Management. There are no tricks as to how to pass the class: read, do your discussion boards, each week requires a short essay (I am taking online classes). I am coming back to school as an adult and am so happy to find a teacher that grades fairly and in a timely manner!
                